Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A supplemental capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027, out of the several funds specified in this act.PART 1GENERAL GOVERNMENTNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: SPECIAL APPROPRIATION FOR THE GOVERNORPoint Whitney Appraisal (92000002)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for expenditure for the costs associated with obtaining an appraisal for the fair market value of the state-owned property managed by the department of fish and wildlife and commonly known as Point Whitney. The appraisal is in anticipation of the sale and transfer of the property to the Jamestown S'Klallam tribe as provided in section 3013 of this act. The office of financial management shall approve the expenditure of funds for the appraisal, consistent with the provisions of this section.(2) The department of fish and wildlife must enter into a contract to obtain an appraisal for the fair market value of the parcel no later than June 30, 2026, and provide a copy of the contract to the governor, house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee.(3) If the department of fish and wildlife fails to enter into a contract for the appraisal as provided in subsection (2), the department of natural resources must conduct the appraisal of the Point Whitney property. The department of natural resources shall complete and provide a copy of the appraisal to the governor, house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee by December 1, 2026.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$55,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$55,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1002. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:SPECIAL APPROPRIATION FOR THE GOVERNORWater Pollution Control Revolving Program Match (92000003)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the fiscal year 2027 water pollution control revolving program state match for public works infrastructure projects. The appropriation must be transferred into the water pollution control revolving account.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$20,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1003. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATEOSOS Cheney Minor Works Preservation Project 2026S (40000010)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$345,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$345,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1004. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATETumwater Area Access (40000011)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$140,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$140,000Sec. 1005. 2025 c 414 s 7009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Behavioral Health Capacity Grants (40000114)The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The ((reappropriation is))appropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1010, chapter 356, Laws of 2020, except as provided for under subsections (2) and (3) of this section.(2) $1,960,000 of the appropriation for the Lummi Nation and $1,960,000 of the funding for the Comprehensive Walla Walla project ((has))have been moved to section 1009 of this act.(3) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section for the Issaquah Opportunity Center (Issaquah) project shall lapse on the effective date of this section.(4) $150,000 of the capital community assistance accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Detox/Inpatient SUD Building (Centralia) project.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($28,999,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,196,000Appropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$150,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($90,232,000))Â Â Â Â Â $113,035,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($119,231,000))Â Â Â Â Â $119,381,000Sec. 1006. 2025 c 414 s 6030 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEconomic Opportunity Grants Authority (40000246)Reappropriation:Rural Washington Loan ((Fund))AccountâState. . . .$903,000Appropriation:Rural Washington Loan AccountâState. . . .$110,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($903,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,013,000Sec. 1007. 2025 c 414 s 1003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Early Learning Facilities - Eligible Organizations (40000656)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $51,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the early learning facility grant and loan program, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.31.565 through 43.31.583, and 43.84.092, to provide state assistance for designing, constructing, purchasing, expanding, or modernizing public or private early learning education facilities for eligible organizations. Up to 3.5 percent of the funding in this subsection (1) may be used by the department of children, youth, and families to provide technical assistance to early learning providers interested in applying for the early learning facility grant or loan program.(b) The department is encouraged to leverage private and public match funds when feasible and may not require match funds for applicants experiencing financial hardship. The department may not consider the level of project match funds as a competitive criterion when selecting or recommending projects for funding.(c) Grants may include awards for construction, renovation, or facility purchase projects that will increase early childhood education and assistance program capacity by supporting conversion of slots from part day programs to full day programs or extended day programs, or conversion of full day programs to extended day programs, as defined in RCW 43.216.010.(2) (($9,000,000))$14,900,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for minor renovation grants.(3) $6,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities revolving accountâstate appropriation and $3,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the Washington early learning loan fund. Of the funds provided in this subsection (3), $3,000,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for emergency grants pursuant to chapter 21 (House Bill No. 1314), Laws of 2025. Up to four percent of the funding in this subsection (3) may be used by the contractor to provide technical assistance to early learning providers. The department may not use any portion of the appropriation in this subsection (3) for administrative expenses of the department.(4) The department of children, youth, and families must develop methodology to identify, at the school district boundary level, the geographic locations of where early childhood education and assistance program slots are needed to meet the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556. This methodology must be linked to the caseload forecast produced by the caseload forecast council and must include estimates of the number of slots needed at each school district. This methodology must inform any early learning facilities needs assessment conducted by the department and the department of children, youth, and families. This methodology must be included as part of the budget submittal documentation required by RCW 43.88.030.(5) When prioritizing areas with the highest unmet need for early childhood education and assistance program slots, the committee of early learning experts convened by the department pursuant to RCW 43.31.581 must first consider those areas at risk of not meeting the entitlement specified in RCW 43.216.556.(6) The department must track the number of slots being renovated separately from the number of slots being constructed and, within these categories, must track the number of slots separately by program for the working connections child care program and the early childhood education and assistance program.(7) When prioritizing applications for projects pursuant to RCW 43.31.581, the department must award priority points to applications from a rural county or from extreme child care deserts as defined by the department of children, youth, and families.(8) For early learning facilities collocated with affordable or supportive housing developments, the department may remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public as an early learning facility.(9) $18,128,000 of the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of early learning facility projects:Batey Square Early Learning. . . .$88,000Cora Whitley Family Center. . . .$485,000Hemlock Commons at Play Frontier. . . .$1,036,000Little Wings Early Learning. . . .$3,550,000New Tomorrow's Hope Child Development Center. . . .$3,050,000Port Angeles YMCA Early Learning. . . .$2,050,000Redmond Childcare Expansion. . . .$769,000Ritzville Childcare Facility. . . .$2,050,000Willard Early Learning Center. . . .$5,050,000(10) The department may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in subsections (1) and (2) of this section for administrative expenses. The department may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in subsection (9) of this section or $50,000 per project, whichever is less, for administrative expenses.(11) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .(($81,128,000))Â Â Â Â Â $87,028,000Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesRevolving AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($87,128,000))Â Â Â Â Â $93,028,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($348,512,000))Â Â Â Â Â $372,112,000TOTAL. . . .(($435,640,000))Â Â Â Â Â $465,140,000Sec. 1008. 2025 c 414 s 1012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 High Efficiency Electric Appliance Rebates (HEAR) Program (40000666)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) (($25,000,000))$35,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to eligible third-party administrators for heat pump and other high-efficiency electric equipment rebates, with a focus on low and moderate-income households, renters, nonprofit organizations, and small businesses. State incentives and rebates for installation of high-efficiency electric equipment, including electrical panel upgrades, provide a benefit to the public consistent with the state's energy strategy and climate mandates by reducing greenhouse gas emissions from the built environment. The department shall administer the grant program in a manner that seeks to maximize greenhouse gas emissions reductions.(b) (($5,000,000))$10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the department to administer grants to eligible third-party administrators for heat pumps for adult family homes.(2) The department shall implement a statewide high-efficiency electric equipment program consistent with the following:(a) Aid the transition of residential and commercial buildings away from fossil fuels by providing education and outreach resources for the installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps and other high-efficiency electric equipment;(b) Provide grants, coordination, and technical assistance to eligible third-party administrators to promote the adoption of high-efficiency electric heat pump equipment for space and water heating; and(c) Develop strategies to ensure that the program serves low-income households, vulnerable populations, and overburdened communities, including dedicating at least 40 percent of the program funding for this purpose. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(c), "overburdened communities" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.65.010 and "vulnerable populations" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.02.010.(3) For the purposes of this section, "eligible third-party administrators" include, but are not limited to, nonprofits, utilities, housing providers, community action agencies, and community-based organizations.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($120,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $180,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($150,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $225,000,000Sec. 1009. 2025 c 414 s 1013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Behavioral Health Facilities (40000667)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants to community hospitals or other community providers to expand and establish new and preserve existing capacity for behavioral health services in communities. The department must consult an advisory group consisting of representatives from the department of social and health services, the health care authority, one representative from a managed care organization, one representative from an accountable care organization, and one representative from the association of county human services. The amounts provided in this section may be used for construction and equipment costs associated with establishment or preservation of the facilities. The department may approve funding for the acquisition of a facility if the project will result in increased behavioral health capacity. Amounts provided in this section may not be used for operating costs associated with the treatment of patients using these services.(2) The department must establish criteria for the issuance of the grants, which must include:(a) Evidence that the application was developed in collaboration with one or more regional behavioral health entities that administer the purchasing of services;(b) Evidence that the applicant has assessed and would meet gaps in the geographical availability and service needs of behavioral health services in their region;(c) Evidence that the applicant is able to meet applicable licensing and certification requirements in the facility that will be used to provide services;(d) A commitment by applicants to serve persons who are publicly funded and persons detained for involuntary commitment, as applicable by facility type, under chapter 71.05 RCW;(e) A commitment by the applicant to maintain and operate the beds or facility for a time period commensurate to the state investment, but for at least a 10-year period;(f) The date upon which structural modifications or construction would begin and the anticipated date of completion of the project;(g) A detailed estimate of the costs associated with opening the beds;(h) A financial plan demonstrating the applicant's ability to maintain and operate the facility; and(i) The applicant's commitment to work with local courts and prosecutors as applicable to ensure that prosecutors and courts in the area served by the hospital or facility will be available to conduct involuntary commitment hearings and proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.(3) In awarding funding for projects in subsection (5) of this section, the department, in consultation with the advisory group established in subsection (1) of this section, must strive for geographic distribution and to allocate funding based on population and service needs of an area. The department must consider current services available, anticipated services available based on projects underway, and the service delivery needs of an area.(4) The department must prioritize projects that increase capacity in unserved and underserved areas of the state.(5) (($70,000,000))$10,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive community behavioral health grants to address regional needs and noncompetitive closure prevention grants. Closure prevention grants must be awarded on a first-come, first-served basis. For competitive regional needs grants, priority must be given to: Youth and adult bed capacity with consideration given to gaps identified in the 2024 behavioral health capital grant facility funding report; and facilities that serve specialized populations, including, but not limited to, services for individuals with traumatic brain injury, dementia, and cooccurring complex needs of youth. Additional categories of facilities may be funded based on identified needs of a region. Eligible facilities include, but are not limited to:(a) Crisis relief centers and stabilization facilities that offer access to mental health and substance use care for no more than 23 hours and 59 minutes per patient, at a time, and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(b) Mental health peer respite centers that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases. No more than one mental health peer respite center should be funded in each of the 10 regions;(c) Grants to community providers to increase long-term intensive inpatient psychiatric treatment services and capacity for children and minor youth including, but not limited to, services for substance use disorder treatment, sexual assault and traumatic stress, anxiety, or depression, and interventions for children exhibiting aggressive or depressive behaviors in facilities that are not subject to federal funding restrictions;(d) Grants to community hospitals, freestanding evaluation and treatment providers, or freestanding psychiatric hospitals to develop capacity for beds to serve individuals on 90-day or 180-day civil commitments as an alternative to treatment in the state hospitals. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the department of social and health services, the health care authority, and the department of health and must only select facilities that meet the following conditions:(i) The funding must be used to increase capacity related to serving individuals who will be transitioned from or diverted from the state hospitals;(ii) The facility is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(iii) The provider has submitted a proposal for operating the facility to the health care authority;(iv) The provider has demonstrated to the department of health and the health care authority that it is able to meet the applicable licensing and certification requirements for the facility that will be used to provide services; and(v) The health care authority has confirmed that it intends to contract with the facility for operating costs within funds provided in the operating budget for these purposes;(e) Enhanced adult residential care facilities for long-term dementia placements discharged or diverted from the state psychiatric hospitals and are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases;(f) Facilities that provide substance use disorder intervention, assessment, and treatment services with secure withdrawal management and stabilization treatment beds that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases; and(g) Facilities where behavioral health supportive services, such as harm reduction and physical health services, are offered within the same facility as behavioral health services and that are not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases.(6) $10,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for one crisis stabilization facility in the King county region consistent with the settlement agreement in A.B., by and through Trueblood, et al., v. DSHS, et al., No. 15-35462, that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental disease. In awarding this funding, the department must coordinate with the health care authority and the King county behavioral health administrative service organization and must only select a facility that has been selected by King county's crisis care centers initiative as the crisis care center for the south King county region.(7) (($49,847,000))$64,259,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Broadway - Compass Health. . . .$5,050,000Cascade Community Health. . . .$541,000Castle Building Purchase. . . .$3,325,000Compass Health: Friday Harbor Facility. . . .$1,850,000Crisis Relief & Sobering Center. . . .$773,000Everett Health Engagement Hub Expansion. . . .$515,000Frontier Behavioral Health: BH Wellbeing Clinic. . . .$1,545,000Healing Lodge of the Seven Nations. . . .$5,050,000ICHS Ron Chew Center. . . .$3,050,000Ituha Stabilization Facility. . . .$927,000Poulsbo SUD Clinic. . . .$18,480,000Pregnant, Parenting & Women's Inpatient SubstanceUse. . . .$1,545,000Recovery CafÃ© Building Acquisition. . . .$2,050,000Skagit County Crisis Stabilization. . . .$549,000((Sound Crisis Stabilization Facility. . . .$3,050,000))Spokane Stabilization Center. . . .$3,050,000Trouves Health Care Behavioral Health Facility. . . .$5,050,000Tubman Health Center. . . .$4,000,000Yakama Detox Center. . . .$5,050,000Yakima Behavioral Health Hub. . . .$1,550,000Yakima County Med Detox Planning and Design. . . .$309,000(9) During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, where the department has awarded a grant for the operation of a crisis diversion or stabilization facility located in Pierce county that is not subject to federal funding restrictions that apply to institutions of mental diseases, the department may amend the contract associated with the grant in order to authorize the facility to be used for any community development block grant national objective.(10) The department shall notify all applicants that they may be required to have a construction review performed by the department of health.(11) To accommodate the emergent need for behavioral health services, the department and the department of health, in collaboration with the health care authority and the department of social and health services, must establish a concurrent and expedited process to assist grant applicants in meeting any applicable regulatory requirements necessary to operate inpatient psychiatric beds, freestanding evaluation and treatment facilities, enhanced services facilities, triage facilities, crisis stabilization facilities, or secure detoxification/secure withdrawal management and stabilization facilities.(12) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department must include provisions that require that the grantee or successor hold the capital improvements for at least a 10-year period. The provisions must require the facility to be used for behavioral health services, but may allow the facility to change ownership or facility type during the commitment period. The department shall monitor the activities of recipients of grants under this program to determine compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in its contract.(13) The department must provide a progress report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 2026. The report must include:(a) The total number of applications and amount of funding requested;(b) A list and description of the projects approved for funding including state funding, total project cost, services anticipated to be provided, bed capacity, and anticipated completion date;(c) A statewide map of new capacity since 2018, including projected bed capacity and opening dates;(d) A status report of projects that received funding in prior funding rounds, including details about the project completion and the date the facility began providing services; and(e) Recommendations for statutory language that would codify the grant program on an ongoing basis including:(i) Evaluation and prioritization criteria;(ii) Monitoring and compliance requirements;(iii) Preconstruction and technical assistance services; and(iv) Data needed to determine the service needs by area of the state.(14) The department must coordinate with the health care authority and department of health to submit capital budget requests to fund behavioral health community capacity grants for the 2027-2029 biennial budget by the due date established by the office of financial management. Associated state budget operating costs must also be identified and requested.(15) The department must notify cities and counties when issuing requests for proposals and must notify applicable cities and counties when awarding contracts.(16) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($129,847,000))Â Â Â Â Â $84,259,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($519,388,000))Â Â Â Â Â $337,036,000TOTAL. . . .(($649,235,000))Â Â Â Â Â $421,295,000Sec. 1010. 2025 c 414 s 1015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Building Communities Fund Program (40000669)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW 43.63A.125.(2) The department may ((not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs has been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by this appropriation. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only))remit state funding on a reimbursement basis for 100 percent of eligible project costs, regardless of the project's match amount, once the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed in an amount sufficient to complete the entire project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public.(3) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Alatheia Capacity Building Project. . . .$595,000Arc Legacy Center. . . .$797,000Boys & Girls Clubs of Benton and Franklin Counties -Pasco Club. . . .$1,425,000Boys & Girls Clubs of Benton and Franklin Counties - Prosser Club. . . .$350,000Building What Matters. . . .$2,500,000Chelan Douglas Community Action Council. . . .$2,000,000Chelan Douglas County Volunteer Attorney Services - New Home. . . .$300,000Commercial Space. . . .$450,000Community Services at Pea Patch Lane. . . .$2,000,000Enhancing Safety and Security. . . .$20,000Expanded Community Resource Center and Food Bank. . . .$2,500,000Farm Fresh HUB Facility. . . .$1,500,000Food Bank Warehouse/Delivery Center. . . .$500,000Healing Headquarters. . . .$990,000Healthy Aging and Wellness Center. . . .$2,000,000Hilltop Family Resource Center - The Cora Whitley FamilyCenter. . . .$250,000Hoh Highlands Government Center. . . .$2,000,000HopesCloset. . . .$12,000Housing Solutions Center Acquisition and Renovation. . . .$1,188,000IACS Kent Community Center. . . .$2,000,000Inchelium Community Wellness Center. . . .$2,500,000Jefferson County Early Learning & Family Support Center. . . .$1,570,000Keep the Community Fed. . . .$1,150,000Lopez Food Center. . . .$1,687,000Market and Community Hub. . . .$900,000Methow Valley Community Center Clean Air Refuge & EnergyRetrofit. . . .$450,000Natural Resources Department Renovations Project. . . .$100,000New Puyallup Health Center. . . .$2,000,000Place for Peace Capital Expansion Project. . . .$540,000Rainier Beach Family Empowerment Center. . . .$2,000,000Room for All Campaign. . . .$690,000Salish Cultural and Recreation Community Center. . . .$2,500,000Skyway Resource Center Acquisition. . . .$1,450,000Somali Community & Cultural Innovation Hub. . . .$2,500,000Vancouver Family Resource Center. . . .$1,228,000Vashon Food Bank New Building. . . .$1,300,000Wenatchee Valley Cultural Center. . . .$2,500,000Youth Community Center. . . .$640,000(4) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$49,082,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$196,328,000TOTAL. . . .$245,410,000Sec. 1011. 2025 c 414 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Weatherization Plus Health Grants (40000671)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely as grants for the low-income weatherization program authorized under chapter 70A.35 RCW, community scaled weatherization projects, and for the community energy efficiency program (CEEP).(1) The department is encouraged to grant funds to at least two community scaled weatherization projects: One located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and one located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains, if feasible. For the purposes of this section, "community scaled weatherization project" means a weatherization project that includes multiple dwelling units that are located in the same neighborhood or area where overlapping factors such as environmental, social, or economic conditions may adversely impact residents, as determined by the department.(2) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the Washington State University energy extension community energy efficiency program (CEEP) to support homeowners, tenants, and small business owners in making sound energy efficiency investments by providing consumer education and marketing, workforce support through training and lead generation, and direct consumer incentives for upgrades to existing homes and small commercial buildings. This is the maximum amount the department may expend for this purpose.(((2)))(3) The department must, to the extent practicable, implement the recommendations in the weatherization plus health 2022 report.(((3)))(4) If funding from these appropriations is used to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency shall, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.(((4)))(5) The department must:(a) Recruit community energy efficiency program sponsors that are community-based organizations located in geographic areas of the state that have not received funding for low-income weatherization programs, targeting hard-to-reach market segments;(b) Leverage funding from community energy efficiency program sponsors in an amount greater than or equal to the amount provided by the state through the weatherization program;(c) Ensure that community energy efficiency program utility sponsors work with nonprofit community-based organizations to deliver community energy efficiency program services; and(d) Identify community energy efficiency program sponsors that support the conversion of space and water heating from fossil fuels to electricity, as part of a set of energy efficiency investments.(((5)))(6) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($35,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($140,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $184,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($175,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $230,000,000Sec. 1012. 2025 c 414 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Public Works Board (40000672)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($10,000,000))$40,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation((, $90,000,000))and $339,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation((, and $265,000,000 of the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation)) in this section are provided solely for the public works board to award new or reimburse previously authorized grants and loans to local governments for infrastructure projects in accordance with chapter 43.155 RCW. When reimbursing projects that are awarded funding by the board under this appropriation authority, the department and the board must first spend funding available from the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation and the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section.Â ((When the state building construction accountâstate and state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations provided in this section are fully spent, the department and the board may then award and reimburse projects using up to $265,000,000 from the public works assistance accountâstate appropriation, but only to the extent that there is a sufficient balance in the public works assistance accountâstate to support additional project awards and reimbursements.))(2) $10,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the board to make emergency grants to local governments for public works projects that were impacted by the weather event described in emergency proclamation 25-07.2.(3) The ((state building construction accountâstate appropriation and the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation))appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($10,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,000,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($90,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $339,500,000((Public Works Assistance AccountâState. . . .$265,000,000))Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($365,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $389,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$1,460,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($1,825,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,849,500,000Sec. 1013. 2025 c 414 s 1019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Community EV Charging (40000673)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the development of community electric vehicle charging infrastructure.(2) Funding provided in this section must be used for projects that provide a benefit to the public through development, demonstration, and deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state.(3) Projects that receive funding under this section must be implemented by, or include partners from, one or more of the following: Local governments, federally recognized tribal governments, or public and private electrical utilities that serve retail customers in the state.(4) Grant funding must be used for level two or higher charging infrastructure and related costs including, but not limited to, construction and site improvements. Projects may include a robust public and private outreach plan that includes engaging with affected parties in conjunction with the new electric vehicle infrastructure.(5) The department must prioritize funding for projects in the following order:(a) Multifamily housing;(b) Publicly available charging at any location;(c) Schools and school districts;(d) State and local government buildings and public hospitals; and(e) All other eligible projects.(6) The department must coordinate with other electrification programs, including projects developed by the department of transportation, to determine the most effective distribution of the systems. The department must also collaborate with the interagency electric vehicle coordinating council established in RCW 43.392.030 to implement this section and must work to meet benchmarks established in chapter 182, Laws of 2022.(7) The department may:(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.(8) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project.(9) Up to three percent of the appropriation in this section is for the department to administer the grant program.(10) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Cowlitz MHD ZEV Depot in Longview.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($23,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($80,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $132,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($103,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $168,000,000Sec. 1014. 2025 c 414 s 1020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Connecting Housing to Infrastructure Program (40000675)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants or deferred loans to local governments and public utility districts to defray the cost of waiving a portion of or all of the fees normally applied to developers for utility connection charges and related street improvements related to new affordable housing projects for low- and moderate-income households.(b) Where applicable, the utility extension and related street improvements must be consistent with the approved comprehensive plans under the growth management act and must be within the established boundaries of the urban growth area as set forth in the approved comprehensive plans. Street improvements are eligible if the improvements are related directly to the utility extension or connection and are adjacent to the new housing units being constructed.(c) Projects must be located within a jurisdiction that imposes a sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.530(1)(a)(ii) or (b)(i)(B), 82.14.540, or 84.52.105.(2)(a) $30,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for grants or deferred loans for system development charges, utility improvements, and street improvements associated with utility infrastructure for affordable housing projects serving low-income households located within a city or county with a population of 150,000 or fewer persons.(b) $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided for the department for pilot grants for system development charges, utility improvements, and street improvements associated with utility infrastructure for affordable housing projects serving moderate-income households. The pilot program must be offered in three counties located in the north central region of the state. The counties must share borders with one another, be located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, and each have a population of 85,000 persons or fewer. By June 1, 2027, the department must submit a report to the office of financial management and to the appropriate committees of the legislature that:(i) Summarizes the results of the pilot program, including an analysis of the need for infrastructure assistance for local governments to support the development of housing affordable to moderate-income households, and the benefits to communities that may result from increasing economic diversity in housing that is made more affordable through infrastructure subsidies;(ii) Describes the number and total dollar amount of application requests and funding awards; and(iii) Makes recommendations regarding continuation or expansion of the pilot program and recommended future funding levels.(3) To be eligible for funding under this section, an applicant must demonstrate, at minimum:(a) That affordable housing development will begin construction within 24 months of the grant or loan award; and(b) A strong probability of serving the original target group or income level for a period of at least 25 years.(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply.(a) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that requires payment of monthly housing costs, including utilities other than telephone, of no more than 30 percent of the household's income.(b) "Low-income household" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.185A.010.(c) "Moderate-income household" means: For purposes of the pilot program authorized in this section, a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is above 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for family size, for the county where the affordable housing project is located, but less than the state median income, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(d) "System development charges" means charges for new utility improvements.(e) "Utility improvements" means drinking water, wastewater, or stormwater utility improvements.(5) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Fort Lawton redevelopment project. The funding provided in this subsection is not subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. The legislature intends to provide funds in the amount of $10,000,000 in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium to the Fort Lawton redevelopment project.(6) $2,550,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Skyway Homeownership project.(((6)))(7) $600,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Finch Green Housing project.(8) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$100,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$400,000,000TOTAL. . . .$500,000,000Sec. 1015. 2025 c 414 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Housing Trust Fund (40000677)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($133,000,000))$199,250,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and (($402,000,000))$432,050,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations are provided solely for the new construction, acquisition, or acquisition and rehabilitation of affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income and special needs populations including, but not limited to, people with chronic mental illness or behavioral health conditions, farmworkers, people who are homeless, and people in need of permanent supportive housing. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of the appropriation provided under this section with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity.(a) (($53,000,000))$65,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and (($162,000,000))$199,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations are provided solely for multifamily rental housing projects. For each affordable housing development project, the department may finance up to a total of $10,000,000 in construction awards, including prior biennia awards.(b) $50,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing projects that serve and benefit low-income people with developmental or intellectual disabilities. The department must use a separate application form and evaluation criteria for applications under this subsection. The department must coordinate with the department of social and health services regarding any needed supportive services and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the housing needs study for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as provided in section 1068(6), chapter 332, Laws of 2021. The department must consider prioritizing funding under this subsection for housing that serves individuals who are exiting residential habilitation centers or facilities.(c) (($100,000,000))$43,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for permanent supportive housing projects in accordance with the apple health and homes rapid permanent supportive housing program created in RCW 43.330.187. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(c), $4,250,000 is provided solely for the Maple Court Permanent Supportive Housing project.(d) (($30,000,000))$43,750,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and (($45,000,000))$86,250,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the development of homeownership projects affordable to first-time low-income households. Projects serving homebuyers whose income is up to 80 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply, except that projects located in rural areas of the state, as defined by the department, serving homebuyers whose income is up to 100 percent of the area median income, adjusted for household size for the county where the property is located are eligible to apply. Eligible activities include, but are not limited to, down payment assistance, closing costs, acquisition, rehabilitation costs, and new construction. The department shall strive to invest at least 20 percent of these funds with by and for organizations, as defined by the office of equity, and make efforts to enact the recommendations of the homeownership disparities work group created in section 128(100), chapter 297, Laws of 2022.Of the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(d), $2,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Orchard Gardens project.(e)(i)(A) $17,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants for the acquisition and preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities where at least 50 percent of the preserved homes are and will remain occupied by low-income households. Funding provided under this subsection (1)(e)(i) may be used for the purpose of avoiding household displacement due to sale or other transactions and ensuring preservation of housing affordability for low-income households for a minimum of 40 years and may be awarded only to eligible organizations as defined in RCW 59.20.030.(B) $2,500,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Bayside Housing project. The department may not require more than 50 percent of the units in the Bayside Housing project to be occupied by low-income households.(ii) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the northwest cooperative development center to provide subgrants to organizations that are mobile home park cooperatives or manufactured housing cooperatives, as those terms are defined in RCW 59.20.030, for critical improvements, repairs, and infrastructure upgrades to promote the preservation of mobile or manufactured home communities as affordable housing. The grantee must award subgrants based on needs relating to health, safety, and cost for resident-owned manufactured housing community cooperatives in Washington.(f) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for eligible organizations under RCW 43.185A.040 to acquire, acquire and renovate, or prepare real property for rapid conversion into permanent supportive housing, transitional housing, indoor emergency housing, tiny homes, or indoor emergency shelters, with a primary focus on serving people with extremely low-incomes who are experiencing sheltered and unsheltered homelessness, including families with children, unaccompanied youth and young people, older adults, and people with disabilities. Acquisitions completed with temporary financing are eligible for funding provided in this section. The department may approve funding only for projects that result in increased shelter or housing capacity for extremely low-income people and households. In awarding funding pursuant to this subsection (1)(f), the department shall prioritize the acquisition of multifamily housing units and housing projects that rapidly move people experiencing sheltered or unsheltered homelessness into housing, including, but not limited to, individuals living in unsanctioned encampments, the public rights-of-way, or other public spaces. Amounts provided in this subsection (1)(f) may not be used for operating or maintenance costs, supportive services, or debt service.(g) (($50,000,000))$90,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for affordable housing preservation projects, which may include, but are not limited to:(i) Projects preserving and extending the affordability commitment period for projects in the housing trust fund portfolio. The funds may be provided for major building improvements, preservation, and system replacements, necessary for the existing housing trust fund portfolio to maintain its long-term viability. The department must require a capital needs assessment be provided before contract execution. Funds may not be used to add or expand the capacity of the property. When allocating funds, the department must prioritize buildings that are older than 15 years and that serve very low-income and extremely low-income populations.(ii) Projects preserving affordable multifamily housing at risk of losing its affordability due to expiration of use restrictions that otherwise require affordability including, but not limited to, United States department of agriculture funded multifamily housing. The department must prioritize projects that satisfy the goal of long-term preservation of Washington's affordable multifamily housing stock, particularly in rural areas of the state. Funds may be used for acquisition or for acquisition and rehabilitation of properties to preserve the affordable housing units beyond their existing use restrictions and place them in Washington's housing trust fund portfolio for a minimum of 40 years. If a capital needs assessment is required, the department must work with the applicant to ensure that this does not create an unnecessary impediment to rapidly accessing these funds.(iii) Projects rehabilitating or replacing housing or facilities impacted by the weather event described in the governor's emergency proclamation 25-07.2 that are: (A) Facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary farmworkers; (B) affordable multifamily housing properties; or (C) affordable manufactured or mobile home communities. Funding provided under this subsection (1)(g)(iii) is not subject to the requirements of RCW 43.185A.150.(iv) The funding provided under this subsection (g) is not subject to the 60-day application period in RCW 43.185A.150.(h) (($5,000,000))$13,300,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary farmworkers. The department shall prioritize funding of projects to areas of highest need. Funding may also be provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for projects that address health and safety.(i) The department shall strive to invest at least 10 percent of the appropriations provided under (a) and (d) of this subsection (1) for either affordable multifamily rental housing or homeownership projects, or both, benefiting low-income households in federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington. The department must conduct a separate application process and use separate evaluation criteria to solicit tribal housing projects and prioritize projects to tribal communities of highest need.(2) $3,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department to provide preconstruction and technical assistance awards in accordance with RCW 43.185A.170. By January 1, 2027, the department must provide the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature with a progress report for entities receiving awards made under this subsection (2). The progress report must list which entities applied for, and were successful in securing, additional financing for the construction or preservation of affordable housing.(3) (($5,000,000))$9,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate and $1,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriations in this section are provided solely for affordable housing urgent repair and risk mitigation grants to be provided on an ongoing basis. Funding is not subject to the 60-day notification requirement in RCW 43.185A.150. Each grant award may not exceed $200,000 per award. However, the department may not limit the number of awards or amount received per organization. When awarding grant funds pursuant to this subsection, the department must offer conditional awards within the per-project limit of $200,000 based on the amount needed as identified by the applicant. The department must subsequently revise grant awards based on actual qualified project costs for which grantees request reimbursement. Of the amounts provided in this subsection (3):(a) $9,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this ((section))subsection (3) is provided solely for affordable housing urgent repair grants ((to be provided on an ongoing basis. Funding is not subject to the 60-day notification requirement in RCW 43.185A.150)). The funding may be provided to address nonrecurring repair projects including repair of units or buildings, abatement of potentially hazardous materials, and safety-related structural improvements of affordable housing. ((Each repair grant award may not exceed $200,000 per award. However, the department may not limit the number of awards or amount received per organization.(a)))(b) $1,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this subsection (3) is provided for risk mitigation investments to prevent water and fire-based property damage of affordable housing.(c) For purposes of this subsection (3), "affordable housing" means:(i) Permanent supportive housing as defined in RCW 36.70A.030; and(ii) Multifamily affordable housing projects in the housing trust fund portfolio.(((b)))(d) If the department receives application requests that exceed the appropriation level in this subsection (3), the department must prioritize projects under (((a)))(c)(i) of this subsection (3).(4) (($57,738,000))$78,824,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided for the following list of projects:315 W 9th Seniors. . . .$1,500,00035th and Pacific Family Housing. . . .$2,050,000American Legion Veteran Housing and ResourceCenter. . . .(($950,000))$1,236,000Bridge Meadows. . . .$5,050,000Bryant Manor Redevelopment. . . .$3,000,000City of Port Angeles Multifamily Housing Pipeline. . . .$2,050,000((Hillsdale Town. . . .$1,750,000))Cloverdale Cottages. . . .$3,450,000Homestead Community Land Trust. . . .$8,050,000Housing Hope Alliance Place. . . .$2,050,000Hummingbird Village Site Acquisition and CapitalDevelopment. . . .$3,050,000Kulshan View. . . .$443,000Lake City Affordable Housing. . . .$7,050,000Lincoln Street Studios. . . .$4,050,000Montgomery Housing South Yakima Senior Housing. . . .$2,050,000SPS Habitat Boulevard Affordable HomeownershipNet Zero. . . .$5,050,000St. Vincent de Paul Star of Hope. . . .$1,545,000Thornton Village Ferndale. . . .$8,000,000Thrive Center Tacoma. . . .(($2,050,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,050,000University of Washington Sunbreak TowerAffordable Housing. . . .$8,050,000WELD Seattle Recovery Housing. . . .$2,050,000YWCA North Central Washington. . . .$5,000,000(5) $4,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for Mary's Place Emergency Family Shelter.(6) $1,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for replacing seasonal farmworker housing in Monitor park that was damaged by the weather event described in emergency proclamation 25-07.2.(7) The department must strive to allocate all of the amounts appropriated in subsections (1) through (3) of this section within the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium in the manner prescribed in each subsection. However, if upon review of applications the department determines there are not adequate suitable projects in a category, the department may allocate funds to other affordable housing projects serving other low-income and special needs populations, provided those projects are located in an area with an identified need for the type of housing proposed. By November 1, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the department must notify the office of financial management, the house capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee of any reallocations of funds made pursuant to this subsection.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($145,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $216,750,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($459,738,000))Â Â Â Â Â $511,874,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($605,238,000))Â Â Â Â Â $728,624,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($2,420,952,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,914,496,000TOTAL. . . .(($3,026,190,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,643,120,000Sec. 1016. 2025 c 414 s 1026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Low-Income Home Rehabilitation Grant Program (40000684)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) $5,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for low-income home rehabilitation projects impacted by the weather event described in emergency proclamation 25-07.2. Eligible projects are not limited to rural areas and may be located in any flood-impacted area of the state.(2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($20,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $50,000,000Sec. 1017. 2025 c 414 s 1027 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2026 Local and Community Projects (40000709)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Except as provided for under subsection (12) of this section, the department may not expend the appropriation in this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(2) Before receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate that the project site is under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or appropriations in which the sole purpose is to purchase real property that does not include a construction or renovation component.(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(5) In contracts for grants authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions that require that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(7) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(8) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:196th/Scriber Creek Control Structure Removal. . . .$500,00023rd & Cherry Renovation/Construction. . . .$1,236,0004th St NW Stormwater ImprovementProject. . . .$773,000Accessibility Renovations for Community Homes. . . .$155,000Adams County Fire Protection District 6 Fire Hall. . . .$418,000Airlift Northwest Hangar. . . .$3,250,000Airway Heights Public Safety Campus. . . .$907,000Alatheia Building Project. . . .$263,000Alliance Place. . . .$500,000Allyn Community Hub. . . .$72,000Anacortes Early Learning Center - Whitney Campus. . . .$42,000Anderson Is. Emergency Communications System. . . .$8,000Aquatic Center at MLK Jr. Park. . . .$257,000Aquatic Resource Mitigation Program. . . .$309,000Arlington Boys & Girls Club Fire Safety. . . .$200,000ASHHO Cultural Community Center. . . .$927,000Asia Pacific Cultural Center. . . .$1,030,000Astria Toppenish Hospital Roof Replacement. . . .$567,000Auburn Ave Theater Rebuild. . . .$500,000((Ballard Boys & Girls Club Security Fence & Lights. . . .$80,000))Battle Ground Downtown Revitalization Design. . . .$515,000Baw Faw Grange. . . .$12,000Bayview Trail Lake Stevens. . . .$500,000Bayview Trail Marysville. . . .$500,000Beerbower Park. . . .$253,000Bellevue Downtown Integration. . . .$250,000Bellevue Family YMCA and Housing. . . .$250,000Bellingham Central Library Interior Renovation. . . .$1,030,000Benston Hall Kitchen and Septic Renovation. . . .$175,000Benton REA's Wildfire Resilience Project. . . .$1,000,000BGC Roof & HVAC Project. . . .$412,000Boat Yard Expansion Project. . . .$500,000Boys & Girls Clubs of Benton and Franklin CountiesProsser. . . .$515,000Bremerton Masonic Temple Kitchen Renovation. . . .$247,000Brier Park Bathroom Rebuild. . . .$489,000Camano Island Legion Veterans Comprehensive HealthInitiative. . . .$300,000Camas Washougal Firefighters Safety Equipment. . . .$155,000Camp Thunderbird (Summit Lake Outdoor School) WaterSystem. . . .$525,000Capitol Theatre Capital Improvements. . . .$100,000Cashmere Branch Library ADA (Cashmere). . . .$33,000Castle Rock Impound/Storage Facility. . . .$370,000CAYA Center Predevelopment. . . .$225,000Center Senior Living Assisted Living Housing. . . .$395,000Central Washington Fair Barns. . . .$400,000Cham Community Center. . . .$1,000,000Chehalis Recreation Park. . . .$50,000Chelan Co. Emergency Management Facility. . . .$500,000Chelan Eagles. . . .$15,000Chief Leschi Park. . . .$58,000City of Elma HVAC Replacement Project. . . .$206,000City of Lakewood - Edgewater Park ImprovementProject. . . .$360,000City of Langley City Hall Solar Plus Storage. . . .$257,000((City of Sunnyside Downtown Gazebo Rebuild. . . .$257,000))City of Sunnyside: Community Pool. . . .$515,000City of Sunnyside: Tina Knoth Park Soccer FieldDevelopment. . . .$515,000City of Tukwila HVAC Replacement. . . .$773,000Civic Center Renovation. . . .$1,000,000Clallam EOC. . . .$2,000,000Clark County Public Safety. . . .$1,500,000Cle Elum Boys & Girls Club Clubhouse. . . .$103,000Clymer Museum Elevator And ADA Upgrades. . . .$230,000Collins Grange #893. . . .$158,000Columbia Park East Boat Launch Replacement. . . .$750,000Community Center Entryway Improvements. . . .$103,000Community Center HVAC. . . .$206,000((Community Library Building Project. . . .$400,000))Community Roots Mill Plain Housing Project. . . .$1,000,000Community Wildlife Readiness-Simcoe Mountains. . . .$26,000Completion of New Fire Station - Franklin CountyFire. . . .$1,000,000Coulee City Rodeo Grounds Improvements. . . .$464,000Coupeville BGC Gymnasium Project. . . .$515,000Creating A More Accessible State Arboretum. . . .$900,000Crescent Grange. . . .$300,000Critical Equipment, Research, and Rearing Capacity. . . .$1,718,000Culinary Upgrade To Battle Ground Public Schools. . . .$278,000Darrington Wood Innovation and Education Center. . . .$145,000Daybreak Star Infrastructure Project. . . .$600,000DeMolay Sandspit Park Improvements. . . .$515,000Des Moines Marina Steps. . . .$1,030,000Distribution System Enhancements. . . .$625,000Dry Creek Grange. . . .$28,000Dundee Hill Community Homes. . . .$376,000East Adams Rural Healthcare: Central MonitoringSystem. . . .$232,000East Wenatchee City Hall. . . .$150,000Eastside Terrace Club Kitchen Renovation. . . .$74,000Eatonville Community Stadium & Lighting. . . .$800,000ED Safer Rooms. . . .$1,030,000Edgewood Grange. . . .$217,000Edmonds Food Bank. . . .$103,000Edwin Pratt Memorial Park. . . .$155,000El Centro de la Raza Mercado Project. . . .$1,030,000Elks Park Little League Fields Renovations. . . .$103,000Emergency Fueling Station. . . .$500,000Emergency Power Generators Yakima County FireDistrict 12. . . .$295,000Energy-Efficient Lighting Upgrade. . . .$26,000Enumclaw LED Lighting. . . .$1,029,000Everett Boys & Girls Club Kitchen Renovation Project. . . .$309,000Excelsior Wellness Site Infrastructure Project. . . .$915,000Expanded Facility for South Kitsap Helpline. . . .$263,000FareStart Barista & Customer Service Job TrainingClass. . . .$309,000FEMA Omak Floodplain Impact Pre-design. . . .$515,000Ferndale Library and Campus EV and Solar Initiative. . . .$515,000Fishing Pier at Spanaway Lake. . . .$773,000Five Mile Prairie Grange. . . .$23,000Float Our Future. . . .$103,000Food Distribution and Storage Improvements. . . .$341,000Foss Waterway Commercial Pump Out. . . .$103,000Freedom Center. . . .$338,000Friends of Lopez Island Pool. . . .$523,000Frontier Park - Goat Barns. . . .$103,000Fruitland Grange #999. . . .$67,000Garrison Springs Creek Restoration Project. . . .$515,000Gig Harbor Sports Fields. . . .$1,030,000God's Pantry Building. . . .$45,000Grand Cinema. . . .$618,000Grandview Police Center. . . .$550,000Grandview Splash Pad. . . .$108,000Grant County Animal Outreach Shelter Building. . . .$256,000Grid-Scale Coordination for WA. . . .$700,000Habitat for Humanity Site Acquisition. . . .$300,000Handicap Ramp and ADA Bathroom Additions. . . .$182,000Haynie Grange Facilities Modernization Project. . . .$170,000Healing Headquarters: A Campaign for RebuildingHope. . . .$250,000Heating Vitalization and Collying System. . . .$177,000Heritage Heights Remodel Phase 4 Generator. . . .$258,000Historic Museum Restoration & Preservation Project. . . .$150,000Historic Slavonian Hall. . . .$515,000Historic Theatre Restoration. . . .$377,000Hopkins Ditch ESA ITP Application Grant. . . .$52,000Hotel Lincoln Historic Restoration Project. . . .$250,000Improvements to Low-Income Child Care Center. . . .$225,000Inland Grange. . . .$98,000Integrated Care Clinic. . . .$1,030,000Interurban Trail Connection - Milton to Edgewood. . . .$779,000Issaquah Bomb Cyclone Recovery. . . .$1,400,000Issaquah's Creeks to Peaks. . . .$103,000Jenkins Creek Recreational Trail. . . .$500,000Julia Butler Hansen House. . . .$115,000Kettle River Grange Windows & Doors. . . .$67,000King Co. Water Dist. 54 Treatment Modernization. . . .$1,030,000Kitsap Lake Park Accessibility Improvements. . . .$321,000Klickitat Natural Resource Conservation Center. . . .$103,000KVH Orthopedics and Surgical ServicesRemodel/Renovation. . . .$618,000La Center Downtown 2.0. . . .$400,000Lake Boren Park. . . .$335,000Lake Chelan Community Center Gymnasium Project. . . .$475,000Lake Chelan Health Emergency Medical ServicesBuilding. . . .$1,097,000Lake City Community Mural Project. . . .$23,000Lake Forest Park, Lakefront Park. . . .$1,030,000Lake Gardner Regional Park Dock. . . .$78,000Lake Stevens Library. . . .$350,000Latino Civic Alliance Workforce Training & Small BusinessHub. . . .$515,000LeMay Grit City Robotics Center. . . .$500,000Lions Park Community Center. . . .$1,000,000Longview Library Elevator Repairs. . . .$300,000Lopez Island Food Center. . . .$361,000Lummi Island Grange. . . .$77,000Lynnwood Public Facilities District ConventionCenter. . . .$1,000,000Maker & Innovation Lab. . . .$1,400,000Mariner Community Campus. . . .$810,000((Marymoor Cricket Facility. . . .$1,200,000))Matlock Grange Hall Structural And SafetyImprovements. . . .$252,000McKinney Center HVAC System. . . .$1,000,000MDC Capital Improvement. . . .$1,236,000Meeker Street Project. . . .$901,000Meridian Grange. . . .$155,000Meridian Habitat Park Community Nature Center. . . .$919,000Mid-Columbia Children's Museum. . . .$1,000,000Mill Creek Boys & Girls Club. . . .$1,030,000Mission Avenue Frontage Improvements. . . .$1,030,000MLK Jr. Community Center Renovation & Expansion. . . .$927,000Molson Grange #1069. . . .$117,000Monroe Rotary Field Turf Replacement. . . .$360,000Mossyrock Grange. . . .$80,000Mother Earth Farms. . . .$52,000Mountlake Terrace Library Resiliency Upgrades. . . .$500,000Mt Spokane - ADA Improvements & Asbestos Abatement. . . .$700,000((Mt. View Pressure Zone Reservoir. . . .$515,000))Multi-Purpose Building Pole Structure. . . .$206,000MultiCare Spokane Internal Medicine ResidencyProgram. . . .$500,000Multicultural Resilience Center. . . .$1,545,000Municipal Services Facility Backup Power Generator. . . .$309,000Muslim Association of Puget Sound. . . .$2,500,000NAAM Expansion. . . .$206,000New Community Recreation Center, Sauk-Suiattle Indian. . . .$515,000Newman Lake Revitalization. . . .$120,000NF Skykomish River Valley: Emergency Response. . . .$1,000,000Nisqually Vocational Education & EOC Training. . . .$4,050,000Nooksack Water Adjudication Facility Needs. . . .$1,250,000Nordic Cottages. . . .$412,000North Bellingham Grange #201. . . .$51,000North Mason Electrical Capacity & Reliability. . . .$1,000,000North Sound Public Safety Training Facility. . . .$250,000Northeast PDA Housing & Childcare. . . .$350,000Northern State Hospital Historic Cemetery Improve. . . .$175,000Northwest Kidney Centers Burien Pharmacy Relocation. . . .$79,000((Northwest Maritime Vessel Design and Feasibility. . . .$463,000))Ocean Shores Food Bank Relocation Project. . . .$283,000Old Swim Hole ADA Ramp. . . .$83,000Othello Rodeo Bleachers. . . .$258,000Outdoors for All Foundation. . . .$1,030,000Pacific Bonsai Museum Renovations. . . .$766,000((Parkland Community Center. . . .$1,000,000))Partners INW Resource Center. . . .$515,000Pea Patch Community Campus. . . .$3,000,000Peck Community Sports Park Expansion. . . .$1,030,000Peninsula Community Health - Bainbridge Island. . . .$556,000Peninsula Health - Community Kitchen. . . .$625,000Perry Tech for Clean Energy Jobs. . . .$5,050,000Peter Kirk Pool. . . .$515,000Pierce Center for Arts & Technology. . . .$1,030,000Pierce County Health Care Workforce Investment. . . .$2,050,000Pioneer Memorial Park Path Accessible to All. . . .$142,000Pioneer Street Slope Stabilization and SlideAlleviation. . . .$1,545,000Plante's Ferry Sports Complex. . . .$1,000,000Point Hudson Energy Efficiency Improvement Project. . . .$309,000Port Angeles Marine Discovery Center. . . .$1,030,000Port Angeles Waterfront Center. . . .$2,000,000Port of Edmonds Mid-Marina Breakwater Repair. . . .$412,000Port of Hoodsport's Public Dock. . . .$71,000Port of Skagit Agricultural Innovation Center. . . .$515,000Port of Vancouver. . . .$155,000Port Orchard Downtown Re-Construction. . . .$1,000,000Portland Avenue Park Sprayground. . . .$773,000Preserving Washington's Oldest Locomotive. . . .$103,000Puyallup Avenue Flood Reduction Project. . . .$1,030,000Rainier Beach Action Coalition FIC P1. . . .$326,000Rainier Valley Food Bank. . . .$1,030,000Rasor Road Water Main. . . .$119,000Recreation Accessibility Improvements Kamiakin MS. . . .$515,000Redmond Asbestos Cement Pipe Replacement. . . .$1,000,000Redmond Intercultural City Services Center. . . .$636,000Regional Animal Shelter and Control Facility. . . .$1,000,000Regional Meat Processing Infrastructure. . . .$250,000Remy Park. . . .$1,500,000Renton Legacy Square Project. . . .$1,545,000Rimrock Grange. . . .$121,000Rise Up Academy. . . .$1,000,000Road 80 Neighborhood Park. . . .$515,000Romance Hill Booster. . . .$170,000Roof Repair & Replacement Project. . . .$187,000Roy City Park. . . .$155,000Rural Access to Care & Social Connections. . . .$3,138,000S. LK. Stevens Grange. . . .$160,000Sail Sand Point. . . .$100,000SAM Building Automation System Replacement. . . .$280,000Samish Nation - Summit Park Building. . . .$206,000Samish Valley Grange #926. . . .$54,000Sammamish Bomb Cyclone Recovery. . . .$330,000Save the Tokeland Hotel - Critical System Upgrades. . . .$261,000Scargo-Lewiston Permanent Supportive Housing. . . .$1,030,000Scott Hill Park & Sports Complex of Woodland. . . .$45,000Seaport Landing Building Demolition. . . .$150,000Seattle International Public Market. . . .$1,325,000Security and Visibility for EYFO. . . .$71,000Security Gate & Fence at Smilow Rainier Vista Boys& Girl. . . .$66,000Sheffield Trail. . . .$1,030,000Shore Aquatic Center Child Care Expansion Project. . . .$773,000Short-Term Lodging Facility - Cancer Patients. . . .$1,545,000Sinto Senior Activity Ctr Cafe Floor. . . .$10,000Sinto Senior Activity Ctr LED Lighting. . . .$4,000Skagit County RFA Apparatus Communications. . . .$505,000Skagit Valley Grange #620. . . .$48,000Skamania County Courthouse Rehabilitation. . . .$515,000Ski Park Bridge. . . .$1,030,000Skokomish Grange #379 - Stem Wall Repair. . . .$103,000Skyline Health Critical Hospital Infrastructure. . . .$1,000,000Snohomish CD's Natural Resource Center. . . .$500,000Snohomish Public Safety & City Services Campus. . . .$1,000,000South Bay Grange. . . .$91,000South Beach Regional Fire Authority Generator. . . .$144,000South Tacoma Fire Station. . . .$2,050,000Southwest Washington Dance Center FacilityImprovements. . . .$152,000((Southwest Washington Fairgrounds 4-H Barn. . . .$767,000))Spokane PD/CJTC BLEA Training Center. . . .$750,000Spokane Valley Heritage Museum. . . .$206,000Spokane Valley Sport Courts. . . .$415,000Spring Hill Grange. . . .$155,000Springdale Frontier Days Rodeo Grounds. . . .$67,000Stanwood Police Station. . . .$100,000Starfire Commons. . . .$2,550,000Steilacoom Tribal Cultural Center and Museum. . . .$309,000Steilacoom-Pierce County NetZero Resiliency Center. . . .$1,133,000Sultan BGC Gymnasium Restroom Project. . . .$155,000Sultan Osprey Park Sports Field Expansion. . . .$798,000Suyematsu Farm Preservation. . . .$124,000Tacoma Historical Society. . . .$2,000,000Tacoma Urban Performing Arts Center. . . .$1,622,000Tahoma SD Playground Accessibility. . . .$378,000Tasveer Film Arts Center. . . .$1,030,000Terminal 4 Expansion & Redevelopment Project. . . .$3,500,000The Nyholm Windmill Relocation and Restoration. . . .$118,000The Pickford Theater on Grand. . . .$237,000The Willows. . . .$1,000,000Thurston County Medical Equipment Bank. . . .$103,000Toppenish Police Station & City Services. . . .$515,000Trent Elementary Community Upgrades. . . .$225,000Tukwila Health & Wellness Center Project. . . .$1,030,000TYT Feasibility Study and Site Preparation. . . .$62,000Uplift Northwest Training Center & HQ Remodel. . . .$1,030,000Upper Kittitas County Community Recreation Center. . . .$155,000Upper Yakima River Spring Chinook Supplementation. . . .$305,000Vashon Community Pool. . . .$70,000((Veterans Memorial Park. . . .$618,000))Voice of Vashon Digital Renovation Project. . . .$167,000Wagner Performing Arts Center Restrooms. . . .$443,000Wahkiakum Community Learning Center. . . .$248,000Walla Walla County Fairgrounds Grandstand Renovation. . . .$25,000Walla Walla Interpretive Signage. . . .$27,000Waller Grange. . . .$84,000Wallingford Boys and Girls Club. . . .$798,000Wapato Lions Park Youth Soccer Field Improvements. . . .$80,000Washington Poison Center. . . .$79,000Washington State Horse Park Facilities Expansion. . . .$375,000((Washougal Community Library Building Project. . . .$1,818,000))Wastewater Treatment Facility. . . .$1,000,000Water Reservoir Mixer. . . .$232,000Water Resilience and Efficiency Project. . . .$3,000,000Water System Improvements. . . .$150,000Waterfront Pedestrian Safety & Accessibility. . . .$1,500,000Wellness House Yakima. . . .$25,000West Mason Fire Headquarters Modernization. . . .$515,000West Wall of Key Peninsula Civic Center. . . .$103,000Western Skamania County Public Safety Complex. . . .$940,000Whitehawk Gratzer Parks Master Plan. . . .$77,000Wilkeson Infrastructure Improvement Projects. . . .$452,000Willapa Harbor Healthcare Facility Replacement. . . .$285,000Winter Hospitality Overflow Accessibility. . . .$515,000Woodcrest Neighborhood Utility Improvement Project. . . .$1,500,000Yakima Valley Public Market. . . .$743,000YWCA Clark County Housing & Empowerment Campus. . . .$400,000(9) $2,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Port of Chehalis Hydrogen Fueling Station and Production Facility project.(10) $440,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the UW Air Quality Monitoring project.(11) $3,000,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Budd Inlet Sediment Clean Up project.(12) $1,000,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Lakebay Marina Creosote Piling Removal project. The requirements of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to the project in this subsection.(13) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,440,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($194,932,000))Â Â Â Â Â $187,814,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($201,372,000))Â Â Â Â Â $194,254,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($201,372,000))Â Â Â Â Â $194,254,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1018. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHousing Accelerator Framework (40001944)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:â¯(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to develop a housing accelerator framework with the goals of:(a) Eliminating barriers to building housing for homeownership and rental purposes;(b) Determining and analyzing primary cost drivers for the development of single-family homes, multifamily housing, and middle housing, and the impacts of those drivers on homeownership and rental housing in order to reduce the cost of housing production for developers and consumers;(c) Accelerating housing development milestone timelines; and(d) Increasing the production of housing units statewide based on goals that are attainable and sustainable.â¯(2) The department shall consult and collaborate with the department of revenue, the department of labor and industries, the department of ecology, the housing finance commission, the office of equity, the Washington state building code council, the affordable housing advisory board, and other state entities as needed. The department must also consult with local governments and appropriate interest groups in implementing this section.â¯ â¯Interest groups with which the department must consult include groups that represent nonprofit and for-profit housing developers, builders and building trades, real estate agents, landlords, tenants, home mortgage lenders, utility providers, public housing authorities, a statewide association representing business, and an organization representing architects.(3) In undertaking the development of the framework, the department must utilize existing studies and reports, including from Executive Order 25-02, and information provided by state entities and interest groups in subsection (2) in this section. The department may use this appropriation to enter a contract with a third-party expert.â¯(4) The housing accelerator framework may include, but is not limited to, consideration and evaluation of:â¯(a) Opportunities to simplify grant application processes among funders.â¯(b) State housing program process, policy and regulation reforms, including, but not limited to:â¯(i) Maximum awards;â¯(ii) Zoning;â¯(iii) Permitting and construction regulations;â¯(iv) Performance building and energy code pathways;â¯(v) Stormwater regulations and flexibility;â¯(vi) Public works contracting and labor and wage requirements;â¯(vii) Project affordability and tax incentives;â¯(viii) Regulatory exemptions;â¯ and(ix) Existing and new revenue potentials to fund new housing developments.â¯(c) Measures of success and timeline in order to meet the goals and objectives of this section.â¯â¯(5) By October 1, 2026, the department must submit a preliminary report with a draft framework for implementing a housing accelerator program to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.â¯ By June 30, 2027, the department must submit a report with the final framework and implementation recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1019. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2027 Local and Community Projects (40001947)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The legislature intends that grants provided in this section support capital projects throughout the state that benefit entities serving local communities within a given legislative district. The department shall enter into contracts with entities to accomplish the purposes intended by the legislature within the parameters outlined in section 8007 of this act.(2) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. COM-1-2026, developed March 9, 2026.(3) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8006 of this act.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,706,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$27,801,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$30,507,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$30,507,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1020. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Multifamily Bldg Efficiency Grants (40001949)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to issue grants or loans to affordable multifamily projects within the housing trust fund portfolio to decarbonize and transition off the direct use of fossil fuels.(2) Awards may include, but are not limited to: Conducting benchmarking, technical assistance, energy management, operations and maintenance planning, deep retrofits, energy efficiency upgrades and greenhouse gas emissions reductions, renewable energy generation, installation of high-efficiency electric appliances and equipment, including high-efficiency heat pumps, and other decarbonization investments.(3) The department must award funding at a sufficient level to complete the financing package necessary for an applicant to accomplish the requested scope of work. The department must prioritize providing meaningful benefits to vulnerable populations in overburdened communities as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$40,000,000TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1021. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEWater Quality Projects (40001951)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:City of Moses Lake Well 29 Treatment. . . .$810,000City of Roy Well Improvements. . . .$1,500,000Spokane County West Plains PFAS. . . .$7,500,000(2)(a) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Quincy IWTP System Repair and Replacement. . . .$4,000,000Summit Pacific Medical Center Culverts. . . .$800,000(b) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this subsection is subject to the provisions of section 8018, chapter 414, Laws of 2025.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,800,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$9,810,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$14,610,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$14,610,000Sec. 1022. 2025 c 414 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCESeattle Energy District Electrification (91002964)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($2,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($2,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1023. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2026 Mobile and Manufactured Homes Assistance (91002979)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to provide technical assistance and grants for acquisition, preservation, investments in deferred maintenance, and infrastructure improvements for affordable mobile and manufactured home communities. Grants and technical assistance must be provided to eligible organizations as defined in RCW 43.185A.040 and 59.20.030. Funding awarded as grants under this section must preserve housing affordability as defined in this section for a minimum of 40 years.(a) $10,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided for grants for the acquisition and preservation of manufactured housing and mobile home communities.(b) $7,000,000 of the state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided for grants to eligible organizations for deferred maintenance, repairs, and infrastructure improvements for affordable mobile and manufactured home communities.(2) For the purposes of this section, "affordable" and "affordability" mean at least 50 percent of the units in a project are occupied by households with incomes that do not exceed 100 percent of the area median income.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$68,000,000TOTAL. . . .$85,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1024. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDistrict Energy Campus Upgrades Committee (91002988)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to: (a) Convene a campus energy upgrades committee to prioritize proposed capital decarbonization projects for state campus district energy systems as those systems are defined in RCW 19.27A.260; (b) submit a list of projects to the governor and the legislature that are recommended by the committee for funding in the 2028 supplemental capital budget; and (c) develop an analysis of barriers to state agencies entering into energy as a service contracts or participating in public-private partnerships, recommendations for legislation, and financial scenarios as described in subsection (10) of this section. The list of projects submitted by the department must be limited to capital investments necessary for addressing critical components of systems that are at risk of imminent failure, have surpassed their expected useful life, or will reach the end of their expected useful life within the next two biennia.(2) The department must provide guidance to state agencies submitting projects to the committee for consideration that aligns the committee review process with the process for agencies submitting budget requests to the governor for consideration in the governor's budget. The department may contract with a qualified nonprofit entity to facilitate the work of the committee and to produce the analyses and report required in subsection (10) of this section.(3) The director of commerce shall appoint members of the committee. By a majority vote of appointed members, the committee shall select a committee chair. Committee members shall serve without compensation but may request reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.(4) Voting committee members must include:(a) One representative of the state energy office established in chapter 43.21F RCW;(b) Three persons with technical or professional expertise in building decarbonization, thermal energy network or district heating and cooling system construction or conversion that is intended to reduce fossil fuel consumption, or related subject matter. At least one of these members must have experience in environmental justice issues and at least one of these members must be from the private sector;(c) One person with experience in developing and advocating for public-private partnerships in the clean energy or clean buildings sector;(d) One person with professional experience in financing complex decarbonization projects;(e) One person with professional experience in engineering complex decarbonization projects;(f) One person representing the interests of organized labor;(g) One person representing electric utilities;(h) One representative of the Washington utilities and transportation commission; and(i) A representative from the office of the state treasurer.(5) One representative of the office of financial management and one representative of the department of enterprise services shall each serve as a nonvoting member acting in an advisory role to the committee.(6) In order to fulfill its duties under this section, the campus energy upgrades committee and the department may solicit preliminary input from agencies that operate district energy systems regarding the development of the committee's evaluation process and methodology. The committee must review the information collected from decarbonization plans received by the department under RCW 19.27A.260 that contain, at a minimum, complete information regarding: (a) Project elements that can be developed as discrete modules or phases; (b) greenhouse gas emission reduction or energy savings estimates for each phase; (c) project cost estimates by phase; and (d) estimates of construction schedules or the amount of time required to complete project phases. The committee and the department may request additional information from agencies that submitted plans under RCW 19.27A.260 in order to validate data used in this review.(7) The committee must consider the amount of leveraged nonstate funding or avoided costs due to the use of public-private partnerships.(8) The committee may consider supplemental criteria such as the amount of operating cost savings resulting from the project; the avoided capital maintenance or replacement costs for repairs to the existing energy system; the readiness of the project to proceed to construction; the ability of the project to improve electric grid reliability in the region; and the alignment of the project with other major capital projects planned for the campus in order to achieve efficiencies and related cost savings when possible.(9) By June 30, 2027, the department must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature:(a) The prioritization framework used by the committee; and(b) A prioritized list of capital projects related to state campus district energy systems recommended for funding in the 2028 supplemental capital budget. The prioritized list must include cost estimates for recommended projects by discrete phase and for the total cost of the project across future biennia, as applicable. The list must group projects into the following categories: (i) Feasibility studies, demonstration projects, and predevelopment activities; (ii) design and construction for discrete project phases or complete projects that can be completed within the biennium; and (iii) minor works for the repair or replacement of project elements that will be a part of or connected to the completed campus decarbonization project.(10) By June 30, 2027, the agency must submit to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature an analysis of barriers to state agencies entering into energy as a service contracts as authorized under RCW 39.35C.050 or participating in public-private partnerships, recommendations for legislation to facilitate agencies' use of these models, and a financial analysis with scenarios as options for agencies to utilize these models to complete decarbonization projects within limited resources.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$650,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$650,000Sec. 1025. 2025 c 414 s 6103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEAnaerobic Digester Development (92001947)The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7032 of this act.))(1) $23,200,000 of the appropriations in this section is provided solely for grants for cost share agreements regarding anaerobic digester development and maintenance projects at dairies. Grants awarded must have at least a 15 percent nonstate match and be awarded through a competitive process that considers:(a) The amount of greenhouse gas reduction expected to be achieved by the proposal; and(b) The amount of untreated effluent expected to be reduced by the proposal.(2) $500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington State University energy extension program to provide technical assistance in the administration of the competitive grant process and to provide ongoing support to dairies and digester operators regarding opportunities to enhance digester function, advance nutrient recovery, and improve the economic sustainability of on-farm digesters.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$13,700,000Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $40,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($13,700,000))Â Â Â Â Â $63,700,000Sec. 1026. 2025 c 414 s 1038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Dental Capacity Grants (92001952)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) Funding provided in this section must be used for construction and equipment directly associated with dental facilities. The funding provided in this section is for projects that are maintained for at least a 10-year period and provide capacity to address unmet patient need and increase efficiency in dental access.(2) The amount provided in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:CHAS Health. . . .$510,000Columbia Basin Health Association. . . .$1,030,000HealthPoint. . . .$258,000HealthPoint (Tukwila). . . .$1,030,000International Community Health Services. . . .$254,000Peninsula Community Health Services. . . .$927,000Peninsula Community Health Services. . . .$973,000Tri-Cities Community Health. . . .$88,000Yakima Neighborhood Health Services. . . .$1,898,000Yakima Valley Farm Workers Clinic. . . .$515,000(3) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,483,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,483,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($21,932,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,932,000TOTAL. . . .(($27,415,000))Â Â Â Â Â $37,415,000Sec. 1027. 2025 c 414 s 1041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEAffordable Housing Supply and Preservation (92001957)The ((appropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:A Path to Homeownership. . . .$2,050,000Affordable Housing Preservation. . . .$515,000Alexandria's House Rehab. . . .$1,030,000Bring it Home II 24-Hour Domestic Violence Shelter. . . .$530,000Cathlamet Eagle Point Roof Replacement. . . .$144,000Center of Success. . . .$1,000,000Chelan River Heights: Creating Affordable Homes inChelan. . . .$258,000Christian Aid Center. . . .$160,000Clark Place. . . .$319,000Crossroads Village. . . .$927,000Eagles Apartments Roof. . . .$134,000Frederickson South Project. . . .$515,000Fusion Family Center Expansion. . . .$1,000,000Grace Landing Property Purchase. . . .$267,000Helping Hands Supportive Housing. . . .$309,000Homes First Preservation of AffordableLow-Income Housing. . . .$773,000((HopeSource Teanaway Court. . . .$7,866,000))Howerton Place. . . .$366,000Kelso Affordable Housing and Community Center. . . .$1,545,000Lake View Affordable Housing. . . .$2,761,000Lila Lane Short-Term Recovery Housing. . . .$258,000Mason Affordable Housing Development. . . .$309,000Meridian Grove. . . .$508,000Mother Nation Spirit Journey Healing Village. . . .$3,500,000Odd Fellows Lodge 20 Affordable Housing. . . .$5,050,000Pea Patch Community Campus Project. . . .$824,000Peninsula Community Health Oak House. . . .$300,000Peninsula Community Health Pine House. . . .$300,000Peninsula Community Health Spruce House. . . .$300,000Richard Allen Apartments. . . .$258,000ROOTS Young Adult Shelter Project. . . .$2,550,000Skagit County Senior Center and Affordable Housing. . . .$1,545,000Spokane Affordable Housing. . . .$515,000Steel Lake Affordable Housing. . . .$258,000The Freedom Project 4-plex. . . .$160,000The House of Bethlehem. . . .$2,320,000The Pointe at Thomas. . . .$1,803,000West Richland Homeownership. . . .$1,520,000YWCA Clark County Housing & Empowerment CampusProject. . . .$618,000(2) The state taxable building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:CasaMiA. . . .$4,050,000Everett Bridge Housing. . . .$3,850,000Hidden Village Mobile Home Park. . . .$4,050,000Hillsdale Town. . . .$1,750,000HopeSource Teanaway Court. . . .$7,866,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($22,236,000))Â Â Â Â Â $37,499,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$21,566,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$59,065,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($22,236,000))Â Â Â Â Â $59,065,000Sec. 1028. 2025 c 414 s 1042 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEMedically Tailored Meals ((of Washington)) Coalition of WA (92002197)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,625,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,625,000Sec. 1029. 2025 c 414 s 1044 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEOpen Doors Multicultural Village (92002217)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($12,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($12,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1030. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCETribal Clean Energy and Climate Resilience (92002299)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $20,097,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to supplement the grant program as provided in section 1022(8), chapter 414, Laws of 2025 for grants to tribes for clean energy development projects. Eligible uses of grant funding include planning, predesign, design, construction, project predevelopment, and deployment of clean energy projects that contribute to achieving the state's greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and related policies.(2) $18,494,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Dungeness Railroad Bridge Replacement. . . .$2,550,000Hoh Highlands Resiliency and Governance Center. . . .$4,185,000LEKT Wellness Center Infrastructure Upgrade. . . .$3,300,000MyLand Forest Soil Resiliency. . . .$2,050,000Quinault Courthouse Relocation. . . .$2,000,000Samish Nation People's House. . . .$309,000Tokul Creek Conservation. . . .$2,050,000Tulalip School Acquisition. . . .$2,050,000Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$26,282,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$4,100,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,209,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$38,591,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$154,364,000TOTAL. . . .$192,955,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1031. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCERegional Needs (92002328)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. COM-2-2026, developed March 9, 2026.(2) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8006 of this act.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$8,723,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$773,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$46,210,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$55,706,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$55,706,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1032. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEWashington Builds (92002336)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department may not expend the appropriations in this section unless and until the nonprofit selected as the state green bank pursuant to section 130(19), chapter 376, Laws of 2024, changes its name to Washington builds.(1) $25,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely to the department of commerce to contract with Washington builds to provide accessible and affordable financing for energy efficiency and renewable energy projects for Washington residents, businesses, and agriculture that reduce costs, lower greenhouse gas emissions, and create jobs statewide. Contracts authorized under this section must require Washington builds to remain an independent nonprofit corporation recognized as exempt from federal income taxation for public benefit purposes.(a) $5,800,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for agreements to support a residential credit enhancement model, including partnerships with lenders and contractors, to finance energy efficiency upgrades, solar installations, electrical vehicle chargers, and emergency HVAC replacements. Where feasible, energy efficiency upgrades should provide electric equipment and infrastructure. Funding must prioritize low-income to moderate-income families and households unable to access traditional financing. Families and households above moderate income are eligible but must not be prioritized.(b) $17,400,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for agreements supporting commercial energy efficiency, including, but not limited to, meeting clean buildings performance standard compliance and helping small businesses and tribes in procuring clean energy and pursuing fleet electrification projects, consistent with subsections (3)(a)(iii) and (iv) of this section.(c) If Washington builds demonstrates to the department that the funding under (a) of this subsection is obligated and achieves a 15:1 leverage ratio and under (b) of this subsection is obligated and achieves a 3:1 leverage ratio, it is the intent of the legislature to appropriate an additional $25,000,000 to Washington builds in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.(2) Projects funded by this section must meet one or more of the following objectives:(a) Increase investment in qualified clean energy projects statewide;(b) Improve the standard of living of Washington residents by supporting efficient, lower-cost clean energy development and financing projects that create high-paying, long-term jobs;(c) Foster the development and consistent application of transparent underwriting standards, standard contractual terms, and measurement and verification protocols for qualified clean energy projects;(d) Support the development of performance data to improve effective underwriting, risk management, and financial modeling and to stimulate primary and secondary markets for qualified clean energy projects;(e) Reduce greenhouse gas emissions;(f) Reduce energy consumption;(g) Improve air quality;(h) Reduce the amount that a recipient of financing funded by this section spends on utility expenses; and(i) Provide financing support that abates climate change through the deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy, reduce energy costs and harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence. Priority must be given to projects benefiting vulnerable populations, including tribes and communities with high environmental or energy burdens, and that complement other state clean energy and energy efficiency programs.(3)(a) In grants authorized under this section, the department must require Washington builds to establish guidelines, screening processes, and evaluation and selection criteria for lenders participating in the credit enhancement model. For all other applicants and project types, Washington builds shall directly offer financial products, including soliciting, evaluating, and monitoring projects funded under this section. Grant agreements must require Washington builds to:(i) Use competitive selection processes to select lender partners, contractors, and projects, except as otherwise provided in this section;(ii) Conduct appropriate due diligence in the use of public funds, including project selection oversight, project monitoring, and compliance with all applicable laws, and including disclosure and conflict of interest statutes;(iii) Adopt policies and procedures establishing borrower eligibility and the terms and conditions of financial support before providing financing for qualified clean energy projects;(iv) Develop and offer financing structures for qualified clean energy projects, including, but not limited to, loans, credit enhancements, guarantees, warehousing, securitization, and other financial products and structures;(v) Leverage private investment in qualified clean energy projects through financing mechanisms that support, enhance, and complement private investment;(vi) Ensure that financing entities provide funds in a reasonable and transparent manner that is consistent with borrower financial interests and state consumer protection standards; and(vii) Charge reasonable fees for financing support and risk management activities.(4)(a) Consistent with chapter 42.52 RCW, a project applicant must disclose in application materials any current or former state employee employed by the applicant or serving on its governing board within the preceding 24 months, including the individual's name, employing agency, position held, and separation date. If it is determined by the department or Washington builds that there is a conflict of interest or a situation that is likely to constitute a violation of chapter 42.52 RCW, the applicant may be disqualified from further consideration.(b) If, after notice and review, the department or Washington builds determines that a funding recipient is involved in a conflict of interest or likely violation of chapter 42.52 RCW or similar law, the department or Washington builds may terminate the funding agreement by written notice and pursue available legal remedies.(5) Requirements in subsection (4) of this section must be included in all funding agreements issued by the department and Washington builds.(6) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to Washington builds for program administration. In the grant authorized under this subsection, the department must include provisions that require Washington builds to:(a) Maintain a centralized public website reporting financing rates, terms, and conditions of all financing support transactions, except where disclosure of such information would reveal trade secrets, confidential commercial information, or confidential financial information;(b) Post a third-party financial audit annually to the public website starting June 30, 2026;(c) Coordinate with market and program participants to disseminate best practices for project oversight and consumer protection;(d) Prepare an annual report for the public on the financing activities of Washington builds, including other sources of funding for the projects, for submittal to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on November 1st of each year, beginning fiscal year 2027. The annual report must address, at a minimum:(i) The location, subject, and financial terms of all projects financed by Washington builds;(ii) The names and addresses of all contractors and financial institutions with whom Washington builds contracted, and the financing projects in which each contractor and financial institution participated;(iii) The balance sheet for Washington builds showing all revenues and costs to the Washington builds for the year, including the compensation provided to each employee of Washington builds; and(iv) Measurable outcomes associated with each project financed by Washington builds, including, but not limited to, reduced greenhouse gas emissions, reduced energy consumption, improved air quality, estimated job creation, income levels of residential financing recipients, and reduced utility expenses, to the extent such outcomes are reasonably ascertainable; and(v) Recommendations for additional or modified reporting requirements in order to better capture the extent to which Washington builds has achieved the objectives set forth in subsection (2) of this section; and(e) Perform other activities as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.(7) Prior to awarding any funds to Washington builds, the department must require Washington builds to include (a) voting members with experience in private sector project finance, banking, and general contracting on its board of directors, and (b) one nonvoting member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, and one nonvoting member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Members of the legislature serving on the board of directors of Washington builds may not receive compensation for their service on the board of directors of Washington builds.(8) The legislature intends to consider the default rates associated with the financing provided pursuant to this section when considering future funding requests for Washington builds.(9) $900,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department's administrative expenses to carry out the provisions of this section.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$25,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$25,000,000TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1033. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEMontlake Homes (92002383)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the city of Seattle to purchase from the Washington state department of transportation the parcel of land designated as Washington state department of transportation inventory control number 7-17-15910 for the purpose of providing no fewer than 50 units of owner-occupied affordable housing, as that term is defined in RCW 36.70A.030.Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,050,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,050,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1034. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2027 Revitalized Local and Community Projects (92002468)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The legislature intends that grants provided in this section support capital projects throughout the state that benefit entities serving local communities within a given legislative district. The department shall enter into contracts with entities to accomplish the purposes intended by the legislature within the parameters outlined in section 8007 of this act.(2) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. COM-3-2026, developed March 9, 2026.(3) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8006 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$33,831,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,215,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$45,046,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,046,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1035. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELocal and Water Infrastructure (92002496)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. COM-4-2026, developed March 9, 2026.(2) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8006 of this act.Appropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$125,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$7,168,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,812,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$16,105,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,105,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1036. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDisaster and Flood Response (92002497)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. COM-5-2026, developed March 9, 2026.(2) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8006 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$25,157,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$26,157,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$26,157,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1037. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCESoil Remediation (92002513)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to contract with a suitable nonprofit organization or local government entity to implement a pilot project in Okanogan county to remediate soil contaminated with dichlorodiphenyltrichloroethane (DDT) and DDT remnants. The pilot project may, if it is determined to be a more cost effective solution, include capping the existing soil and importing additional topsoil. The department must select a location for the pilot project that is not larger than 50 acres in size and that is utilized by not fewer than 10 cannabis producers.(2) The department must provide a status report on the status of the pilot project to the office of financial management and to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2027.(3) If the department determines that funding levels in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium are insufficient to complete the pilot project, the department must submit a decision package to request additional capital budget funding in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,000,000Sec. 1038. 2025 c 414 s 1063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMinor Works - Preservation (40000485)Appropriation:Thurston County Capital Facilities AccountâState. . . .$1,366,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$235,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$1,601,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($5,464,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,404,000TOTAL. . . .(($6,830,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,005,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1039. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCapitol Campus Window Film (40000627)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$345,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$345,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1040. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCapitol Campus Security (40000628)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $300,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for a feasibility study for the installation of ballistic glass windows on west campus, and design and planning level cost estimates for installation of ballistic glass on the legislative building.(2) $200,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purchase of level 5 mobile ballistic glass panels.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1041. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Building Repairs (40000629)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1042. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESMadrona Tenant Improvements (40000630)Appropriation:State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$228,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$228,000Sec. 1043. 2025 c 414 s 1068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESCampus Energy System Replacement (91000449)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the design of an ambient temperature loop project to replace the heating and cooling system on the capitol campus.(2) Upon completion of 90 percent of the project design, or as soon as is feasible, the department must provide a report to the house capital budget and senate ways and means committees that includes:(a) The estimated project timeline, including the estimated funds that will be needed at each step of the project. The department must consider phasing the construction of the project over three to four fiscal biennia;(b) If the total estimated project funds vary from the estimates previously provided to the legislature, an explanation as to the reason for the cost variance;(c) If the design of the system varies from the system details previously provided to the legislature, an explanation as to the reason for the design variance; and(d) Specific steps that will be incorporated in the bid process to ensure the contractor awarded the project:(i) Has experience with projects of this size and with this type of system;(ii) Has a strong relationship with installers and equipment vendors; and(iii) Uses equipment with adequate warranties in the event of mechanical failures.(3) During the course of design and construction, the department must timely notify the capital budget chairs and ranking minority members of any cost overruns. If the department intends to seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal, the agency must submit reduced cost options together with its budget request.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$86,000))Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$9,237,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($364,000))Â Â Â Â Â $450,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$160,885,000TOTAL. . . .$170,572,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1044. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESPrevailing Wage Study (91000478)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: $100,000 is provided solely for the capital projects advisory review board to study the objectives, feasibility, and impacts of establishing a requirement for public works contracts to stipulate annual adjustments to the minimum hourly wages for laborers, workers, and mechanics at a rate of no less than the latest prevailing rate of wage. The board's study must include an examination of the possible impacts to the costs and delivery of state and local capital projects. In assessing feasibility and impacts, the board must consider the extent to which appropriate exemptions and phased implementation strategies would minimize project disruptions and unpredictable cost fluctuations. The board must submit a report with its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2026.Appropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$100,000Sec. 1045. 2025 c 414 s 1070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICESLegislative Campus Modernization (92000020)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1044, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7033 of this act.(2) The department must consult with the senate facilities and operations committee or its designees and the house of representatives, executive rules committee or its designees at least every other month.(3) All appropriations must be coded and tracked as separate discrete subprojects in the agency financial reporting system.(4) If the department receives information, after value engineering has been performed, that projected costs for any of the subprojects in subsections (5) or (6) of this section will exceed the amount provided in the respective subsections, including projected costs in future biennia, the department must timely notify and provide that information in writing to the project executive team. Prior to proceeding with design or construction, the department must:(a) Provide at least three options that do not include square footage reduction to reduce the subproject costs to stay within the amount provided for that subproject and the project schedule;(b) Consult with the project executive team on the options offered, before proceeding with a reduced cost option; and(c) Receive majority consensus from the project executive team to either adopt and move forward with reduced cost options that bring the subproject costs within amounts appropriated or adopt a tentative modified budget for the subproject. If a tentative modified budget is adopted, the department must seek additional funding in the next agency budget submittal.(5) (($135,043,000))$49,501,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the rehabilitation, design, and construction of the Pritchard building and the renovation of the John L. O'Brien building subproject.(6) $10,923,000 of the state building construction accountâstate ((appropriation))reappropriation and (($672,000))$671,000 of the climate commitment actâstate reappropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for the legislative campus modernization global subproject that includes, but is not limited to, the capitol lot (opportunity site six east), 15th avenue southwest, the John A. Cherberg parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, the John L. O'Brien parking lot on 15th avenue southwest, Columbia street site work, the legislative modular building, and Water street site work.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($672,000))Â Â Â Â Â $671,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$66,585,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($67,257,000))Â Â Â Â Â $67,256,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$49,501,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($146,656,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,657,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$263,414,000Sec. 1046. 2025 c 414 s 6132 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTJoint Force Readiness Center: Replacement (30000591)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$42,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,869,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$53,869,000Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$431,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($54,300,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,300,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1047. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTFlood Response: County Risk and Needs Assessment (92000007)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants of up to $300,000 per county for a risk and needs assessment addressing flood response, preparedness, and prevention. Grant funds may be used for the following:(a) Identification of waterway and debris clearance needs consistent with section 1048 of this act;(b) Evaluation of flood prevention strategies and prioritization of future capital investments; and(c) Planning and administrative costs directly related to activities described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.(2) Grants are provided solely for counties that were impacted by the weather event described in emergency proclamation 25-07.2. Each county may administer the grant directly or through a flood control district, flood control zone district, or other special purpose district with authority over flood control or waterway management within the county. The county shall consult and coordinate with any such district in conducting the assessment.(3) Up to $200,000 of the appropriation in this section may be used by the department for administration and county assistance.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1048. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENTFlood Response: Waterway and Debris Clearance (92000008)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to counties to address the removal of debris in rivers and other waterways related to the weather event described in emergency proclamation 25-07.2. Preference must be given to projects with the greatest mitigation impact for downstream flooding risk or damage. A county may administer the grant directly or through a flood control district, flood control zone district, or other special purpose district with authority over flood control or waterway management within the county.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$3,100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1049. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2025 c 414 s 1030 (uncodified); and(2) 2025 c 414 s 1034 (uncodified).(End of part)PART 2HUMAN SERVICESNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONWashington State Criminal Justice Training Commission ADA Upgrade (40000045)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$252,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$252,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2002. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONBurien Campus Indoor Shooting Range (40000047)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for an evaluation of the build-out of an indoor shooting range on the Burien campus. In the selection of the consultant, prior experience in designing and constructing firing ranges, as well as experience with the processes of any applicable local permitting authorities, must be considered. The total proposed project cost must not exceed $75,000,000.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$350,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$74,650,000TOTAL. . . .$75,000,000Sec. 2003. 2025 c 414 s 2011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESMinor Works 2025-27 (40001155)Appropriation:Charitable, Educational, Penal, and ReformatoryInstitutions AccountâState. . . .(($582,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,637,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($7,832,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,027,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($8,414,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,664,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($33,656,000))Â Â Â Â Â $50,656,000TOTAL. . . .(($42,070,000))Â Â Â Â Â $63,320,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2004. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESSpecial Commitment Center â Emergency Backup Generator Replacement (40001307)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,115,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,115,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2005. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESWSH-Building 27: Fire Doors Replacement (40001322)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,940,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,940,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2006. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESOB2 Facility Improvements (40001324)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,257,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,257,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2007. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESESH Security Measures (40001325)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$250,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$250,000Sec. 2008. 2025 c 414 s 2023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH2025-27 DWSRF State Match (40000088)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or other public works facility for which an investment grade efficiency audit is reasonably obtainable, the department shall require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade efficiency audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its drinking water state revolving fund program loan.(2) The department must encourage local government use of federally funded drinking water infrastructure programs operated by the United States department of agriculture rural development agency.Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,920,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($100,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $127,680,000TOTAL. . . .(($125,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $159,600,000Sec. 2009. 2025 c 414 s 2021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTHPlanning and Engineering Loan (40000085)Appropriation:Drinking Water Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $24,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $30,000,000Sec. 2010. 2025 c 414 s 2025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSSVH - Skilled Nursing Facility Replacement (40000109)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the purchase of land for construction and associated off-site improvements necessary to run utilities and secure easements, as well as design of a skilled nursing facility in Spokane.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($8,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,900,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($144,956,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,410,000TOTAL. . . .(($152,956,000))Â Â Â Â Â $165,310,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2011. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSVC - Phase V Expansion in Medical Lake (40000118)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$6,080,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$675,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$6,755,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,755,000Sec. 2012. 2025 c 414 s 2031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen Secure Facility Improvements (40000546)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,653,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,901,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($13,354,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,054,000Sec. 2013. 2025 c 414 s 2034 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESMinor Works Project (40000589)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,578,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,668,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($22,312,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,672,000TOTAL. . . .(($27,890,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,340,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2014. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESGreen Hill School Security Doors/Locks Sleeping Rooms (40000615)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,800,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,800,000Sec. 2015. 2025 c 414 s 2038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESAdditional Juvenile Rehabilitation Capacity (91000078)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to fund:((acquisition, predesign,))(a) Predesign and design ((of one or more facilities to be used as medium security))for renovation of a facility for use as a juvenile rehabilitation ((facilities))facility; and (b) development of a plan to establish a secure facility located on the east side of the Cascade mountains. Consideration must be given to geographic availability of services and the feasibility of renovating existing facilities that are able to be operational by the end of fiscal year 2029. The department must consider prioritizing facilities that support no more than 50 youth.(2) $500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for predesign ((and $2,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for acquisition and design))and planning activities.(3) The predesign and design must include recommendations for living units and spaces for recreation, education, programming, and medical and behavioral health services. ((Recommendations must be informed by best practice models and must include a justification, estimated time of construction, and cost))In developing these recommendations, the department shall consider best-practice models and consult with experts in trauma-informed juvenile justice policies and facility design.(4) The department shall submit a plan of design and construction costs, including a construction schedule, as part of its decision package for consideration in the 2027-2029 biennial capital budget. The plan must include:(a) The proposed security level and bed capacity of the new facility, including any specialty populations that may be served;(b) Estimated operating budget costs for the facility;(c) A timeline for relocating residents from the facility known as Harbor Heights to either Green Hill School or the renovated facility; and(d) A proposal for vacating and closing Harbor Heights that minimizes any overlap in operating costs between Harbor Heights and the new facility provided that Harbor Heights shall remain open and operational until residents are fully transitioned out.(5) The department shall consult with relevant entities to ensure that the occupancy use and site modifications proposed in the predesign and design are allowable.(6) The plan to establish a secure facility located on the east side of the Cascade mountains must include an outline of options and recommendations for future placement. In addition, the department shall consider the possibility of utilizing existing facilities operated by local partners or a consortium of counties for short-term juvenile adjudications. The department shall provide a progress report to the governor and the chairs of the house of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee no later than June 30, 2027.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000,000Sec. 2016. 2025 c 414 s 2041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMCC: SOU and TRU - Domestic Water and HVAC Piping System (40000246)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($25,691,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,892,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($13,897,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,772,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,438,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,237,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($41,691,000))Â Â Â Â Â $27,816,000TOTAL. . . .(($84,717,000))Â Â Â Â Â $84,717,000Sec. 2017. 2025 c 414 s 2047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSMinor Works - Preservation Projects (40000769)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($24,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,800,000TOTAL. . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $41,000,000(End of part)PART 3NATURAL RESOURCESSec. 3001. 2025 c 414 s 3001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Waste Tire Pile Cleanup and Prevention (40000621)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: $1,600,000 of the waste tire removal accountâstate appropriation and $1,600,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation are provided solely for the Twin Bridges Road Tire Pile Clean up project.Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,600,000Waste Tire Removal AccountâState. . . .(($1,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,600,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$4,200,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($4,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,800,000TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,000,000Sec. 3002. 2025 c 414 s 3009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Cleanup Settlement Account Projects (40000629)Appropriation:Cleanup Settlement AccountâState. . . .(($650,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,150,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $0TOTAL. . . .(($650,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,150,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3003. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYVW Settlement Funded Projects (40000018)Reappropriation:General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$60,278,000Appropriation:General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$22,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$52,422,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$134,700,000Sec. 3004. 2025 c 414 s 3021 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000681)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $34,915,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate))natural climate solutions accountâstate and $3,585,000 of the Columbia River basin water supply revenue recovery accountâstate appropriations in this section are provided solely for planning, design, engineering, development, coordination, and construction of the Odessa - OGWRP EL 22.1 pipeline project. Funding in this subsection may also be used as matching funds.(a) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection (1), a project must have at least 80 percent of its design work completed by July 1, 2025.(b) The east Columbia basin irrigation district may only be allowed to make any administrative charges sufficient to administer the state grants, not to exceed one percent of amounts provided to them within this appropriation, with the requirement to report administrative expenditures to the office of Columbia River annually.(2) $3,200,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the Columbia basin irrigation district for the purpose of completing design and engineering specifications for irrigation infrastructure to serve the remaining acres in the Odessa groundwater replacement project.(3) $800,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate))natural climate solutions accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to enter into an agreement with the United States bureau of reclamation to reimburse the bureau for costs related to the design and review activities necessary to complete the transfer of the groundwater replacement delivery system title to the United States from the east Columbia basin irrigation district and to secure project reserved power for public delivery systems.(((3)))(4) Projects constructed with moneys provided pursuant to this section may be constructed by private contractors, by public entities, or by a combination of both.(((4)))(5) Projects constructed with moneys provided pursuant to this section may be constructed in phases.(((5)))(6) The ((state building construction accountâstate appropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Columbia River Basin Water Supply RevenueRecovery AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($55,385,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,200,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$55,385,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($60,385,000))Â Â Â Â Â $63,585,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$241,540,000TOTAL. . . .(($301,925,000))Â Â Â Â Â $305,125,000Sec. 3005. 2025 c 414 s 3031 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYCapitol Lake-Deschutes Estuary Project (92000226)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The legislature finds that the portion of the capital campus known as Capitol Lake is an important ecological and recreational resource for the State of Washington that was once connected to the Deschutes Estuary. Due to a lack of routine management over the last 25 to 50 years, the lake ecosystem is degraded, resulting in poor water quality, excessive algae growth, and invasive species proliferation.The legislature further finds that the department of enterprise services has conducted significant outreach and study by engaging with the Squaxin Island Tribe, local municipal governments, the Port of Olympia, and other local stakeholders towards the goal of a long-term management solution that returns the lake to an estuary. The legislature acknowledges these efforts and partner commitments towards contributing to future maintenance and renewal but recognizes that the substantial investment necessary for the estuary restoration plan as currently proposed is not feasible. In an effort to both address the degraded lake water quality and identify a cost-effective approach to an estuary restoration that the state can responsibly support, the legislature intends to transfer management of this aquatic ecosystem to a state agency with natural resources expertise. Addressing the water quality of the lake will not only provide immediate benefit to the health of Capitol Lake and Budd Inlet, but also serve as a necessary precursor to a future estuary restoration.(2) (($8,000,000 of the))(a) The appropriations in this section ((is))are provided solely for the department, in consultation with the department of enterprise services and office of the governor, to complete the design, conduct additional value engineering, seek additional nonstate project funding, and begin the land acquisition process for the Deschutes estuary restoration. The legislature recognizes that completing the project design is necessary for the state to seek and secure additional nonstate funding, including federal grant opportunities. The department shall use past reports and studies, consider existing stakeholder input, and critically consider elements of the current, but incomplete, department of enterprise services design. The updated design must include a recommended series of projects phased over several biennia with defined deliverable outcomes that move the state forward to a completed estuary. For each project phase, the plan shall identify expected timelines, estimated expenditures, and opportunities for non-state matching fund sources that contribute to the planned restoration and construction costs. The design may include only those elements associated with the construction of the estuary habitat, roadway and bridge improvements necessary to remove the existing 5th avenue bridge and associated necessary infrastructure and must minimize overall project cost. Recreational or pedestrian enhancement elements of the project must be designed as a separate bid package that could be added to the project at a future date, subject to the availability of funding appropriated for these elements. The design of the overall project must be modified to reduce construction costs wherever possible, including incorporating any cost savings that are identified in value engineering processes conducted at 60 percent design completion and at 90 percent design completion.(b) Upon completion of final design, on or before June 30, 2027, the department shall report to the governor, house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee on total project costs and water quality impacts. The report must:(i) Provide a detailed breakdown of total project costs with phasing options for funding, including identification of costs attributable to roadway and bridge construction components of the project that are identified in the completed design. It is the intent of the legislature that state funding for the construction of necessary roadway and bridge components be funded outside of the capital budget and such costs must be identified separately, to the extent feasible. The legislature does not intend to require the department to renegotiate any existing executed interlocal agreements or memoranda of understanding;(ii) Provide a comparison of total project costs with one or more other large-scale habitat or ecological restoration projects planned or completed in the state; and(iii) Assess to what extent the completed project is expected to improve the water quality of Budd Inlet and connected water bodies, including the former Capitol Lake. In addition, the department must estimate the extent to which stormwater runoff and the connected tidal action from other areas of the Puget Sound may contribute to Budd Inlet's dissolved oxygen total maximum daily load.(((6) $750,000))(3) $1,050,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for project management costs.(4) Of the amounts provided in this section, $300,000 is provided solely for continuing right-of-way property acquisition work.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$15,950,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,750,000))General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$9,259,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$25,209,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $403,616,000TOTAL. . . .(($14,750,000))Â Â Â Â Â $428,825,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3006. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYStatewide Water Conservation (92000233)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following list of projects:Kennewick Irrigation District Main Canal Lining. . . .$447,000Kittitas Reclamation District South. . . .$875,000Mill Creek Passage - 3rd to Colville. . . .$1,000,000Roza Canal Floor Replacement. . . .$3,875,000Roza Canal Sealing Project. . . .$600,000Touchet River Mile 42. . . .$500,000Water System Efficiency Leak Detection and Repairs. . . .$180,000Waynita Creek Restoration. . . .$1,500,000Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$8,977,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,977,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3007. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONMillersylvania Welcome Center and Entrance Modifications (40000498)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$630,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$2,610,000TOTAL. . . .$3,240,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3008. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONLittle Hoko River Floodplain Restoration (40000513)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3009. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2025-27 Statewide - ADA Compliance (40000514)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The legislature intends that the Washington state parks and recreation commission prioritize compliance with the terms of the settlement agreement entered into between the United States and the Washington state parks and recreation commission (USAO #2023v00508; DJ #204-82-233) for new capital investments until such time as the agreement is fully satisfied. Working within the terms of the settlement agreement and any corresponding approved remediation plan, the commission should prioritize barrier removal in parks with high attendance rates.(2) No later than October 1, 2026, the commission shall submit a report to the house capital budget committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the governor's office that includes: (a) A list of all Americans with disabilities act-related capital remediation projects completed or anticipated for completion in 2026, including project locations and associated costs; and (b) a proposed plan for the 2027â29 fiscal biennium identifying americans with disabilities act-related capital remediation projects, including project locations and estimated costs, that can be reasonably achieved during the biennium.(3) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $189,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for a staff position to provide direct support for implementation of these projects.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,189,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$105,000,000TOTAL. . . .$110,189,000Sec. 3010. 2025 c 414 s 3055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2025-27 State Parks Capital Preservation Pool (92001133)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) It is the intent of the legislature that the campground at Lyons Ferry State Park be restored and available for public use.(2) In order for the appropriation in this section to be considered for reappropriation in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium, the commission must restore public use of the Lyons Ferry State Park campground by December 31, 2026.(((3) $3,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for statewide ADA compliance projects.))Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,600,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,600,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($22,400,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,400,000TOTAL. . . .(($28,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,000,000Sec. 3011. 2025 c 414 s 3062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Community Forest Grant Program (40000562)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-5-2025, developed April 26, 2025, and LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-1-2026, developed March 9, 2026. The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,248,000))Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$9,372,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($24,992,000))Â Â Â Â Â $37,488,000TOTAL. . . .(($31,240,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,860,000Sec. 3012. 2025 c 414 s 3073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000803)Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($7,904,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,404,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($31,616,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,616,000TOTAL. . . .(($39,520,000))Â Â Â Â Â $57,020,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3013. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICESkokomish Timber Land Acquisition (91003002)Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$2,020,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,020,000Sec. 3014. 2025 c 414 s 3086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESoos Creek Hatchery Renovation (30000661)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$183,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,726,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($22,095,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,043,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($29,821,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,952,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3015. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEBob Oke Game Farm Relocation and Remediation Efforts (91000172)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $50,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the department of fish and wildlife to identify suitable locations for the relocation of the Bob Oke game farm and to begin the process for remediating the current location of the Bob Oke game farm, as described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.(2)(a) The department shall identify one or more alternate locations potentially suitable for the relocation of the Bob Oke game farm. The department shall first determine whether a property that the department currently owns or manages is suitable for relocation of the Bob Oke game farm. By December 1, 2026, the department shall report the list to the committees of the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over the capital appropriations act and the senator and members of the house of representatives representing the legislative district in which the Bob Oke game farm is located.(b) To evaluate potential alternate locations, the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2027-2029 biennial capital appropriations act for predesign to:(i) Conduct or obtain a hydrogeologic assessment of each candidate site to evaluate the potential for nutrient, manure, or other operational impacts to groundwater, surface water, and municipal or residential drinking water supplies;(ii) Evaluate proximity to existing public water systems, wellhead protection areas, and critical aquifer recharge areas;(iii) Consider access, infrastructure needs, land availability, zoning and land use compatibility, and the ability to maintain wildlife management and release functions;(iv) Consult with affected local governments, water utilities, tribes, and conservation districts; and(v) Estimate the cost, timeline, and logistical requirements for relocation to each candidate site.(c) It is the intent of the legislature that at the conclusion of the predesign, the department shall submit a relocation report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature. In addition to office of financial management predesign criteria, the report should include:(i) A summary of sites identified and evaluated and the criteria used;(ii) A recommendation of a preferred location;(iii) A proposed acquisition or leasing strategy;(iv) A schedule for transition of operations;(v) Concept-level development plans;(vi) Estimated capital and operating costs; and(vii) Any statutory or budgetary actions required to complete the relocation.(d) It is the further intent of the legislature that once a preferred location has been identified, the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2029-2031 biennial capital appropriations act to request funding needed to relocate the Bob Oke game farm to the preferred location, and that the department shall continue to seek funding until the game farm has been relocated.(3)(a) The department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2027-2029 biennial capital appropriations act to complete design work associated with the remediation of the existing location of the Bob Oke game farm. Design will include work to be done prior to closure and work to be done upon closure.(b) The remediation plan must include:(i) Continued groundwater and soil monitoring;(ii) Measures to prevent further nitrate or nutrient leaching to groundwater; and(iii) Evaluation of soil treatment, land cover, or other restoration techniques to reduce existing nutrient concentrations.(c) Once the design work associated with remediation of the existing location is complete, it is the intent of the legislature that the department shall submit a capital appropriations request for the 2029-2031 biennial capital appropriations act to request funding needed to fully remediate the current site, and that the department shall continue to seek funding until the site has been fully remediated.(4)(a) For the period of time until the department relocates the Bob Oke game farm from its current location, the department must maintain and comply with the terms of a waste discharge permit issued pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW for the game farm.(b) The department must submit a report to the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over water quality issues and capital budget matters, and to the office of financial management, no later than December 15, 2026, that describes the steps the department has taken to comply with the terms of the permit.Appropriation:State Building Construction Accountâstate. . . .$50,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000Sec. 3016. 2025 c 414 s 3098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEMinor Works Preservation 2025-27 (40000278)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department must complete the work of building demolition at the snow creek resort within existing appropriations.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$24,000,000TOTAL. . . .$30,000,000Sec. 3017. 2025 c 414 s 3102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEPoint Whitney Appraisal and Sale (92001254)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the ((appraisal and)) administrative costs associated with offering for sale and transfer of the state-owned property at Point Whitney to the Jamestown S'Klallam tribe. Subject to the conditions in this section, the department must transfer the Point Whitney property to the Jamestown S'Klallam tribe.(2) ((Before the department may offer the property for sale to the Jamestown S'Klallam tribe, the department must, after conferring with the recreation and conservation office, communicate to the Jamestown S'Klallam tribe the nature and extent of any public access elements or other requirements associated with grants that the department has received in connection with the property.)) The Jamestown S'Klallam tribe may take title to the property only on the following conditions ((that)): (a) ((It does so))The tribe pays to the department an amount equal to the appraised fair market value of the property; (b) the tribe takes title subject to any conditions, covenants, restrictions, and requirements associated with the property as a result of any grants that the department or the recreation and conservation office have received in connection with the property; (((b) it))(c) the tribe agrees to satisfy any remedy required as a result of its uses of the property that may be in conflict with such conditions, covenants, restrictions, and requirements; and (((c) it))(d) the tribe agrees to waive any claim or assertion of sovereign immunity from suit, including arbitration and enforcement of any decision in any arbitration, to interpret or enforce the provisions of such conditions, covenants, restrictions, and requirements.(3) ((Subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the department shall offer the sale of the property at appraised fair market value to the tribe before June 30, 2026. If the tribe chooses to purchase the property, it must do so at the appraised fair market value and subject to the conditions set forth in subsection (2) of this section))No later than January 1, 2027, the department must reach a memorandum of understanding with the tribe to transfer the property for the appraised fair market value and under the conditions provided in subsection (2) of this section. The memorandum must be reported to the governor's office, house of representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee by January 15, 2027.(4) The department may retain the funds generated by the sale for the primary purpose of satisfying any requirements that may be imposed by the recreation and conservation office as a result of grants received by the department or the recreation and conservation office in connection with the property, and may reinvest any remaining funds in other properties that offer public access to water, fishing, and other equivalent recreational opportunities.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($50,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($50,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000Sec. 3018. 2025 c 414 s 3101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE2025-27 Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (40000347)Appropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$10,000,000General FundâPrivate/Local. . . .$1,000,000Fish, Wildlife, and Conservation AccountâState. . . .$500,000((Limited Fish and Wildlife AccountâState. . . .$500,000))Special Wildlife AccountâFederal. . . .$1,000,000Special Wildlife AccountâPrivate/Local. . . .$1,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$13,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$54,000,000TOTAL. . . .$67,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3019. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFEPort of Woodland (92001259)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the administrative costs associated with offering for sale and transfer of the Cowlitz County Tax Parcel Number WB1502003 to the Port of Woodland, as described and under the terms and conditions set forth in the deed recorded as Auditor's No. 574998, Volume 703, Page 665. The offer of sale shall include the associated stream bank easement recorded as Auditor's No. 576579, Volume 705, Page 107. The Port of Woodland may take title to the property only on the following conditions: (a) The port pays to the department the amount for the property as required by the granting deed; and (b) the port provides public access to the Columbia River elsewhere on port property.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3020. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFESprague Lake Restoration (92001260)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$100,000Sec. 3021. 2025 c 414 s 3105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESSchool Seismic Safety Site Class Assessments (40000444)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($663,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,093,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($2,652,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,372,000TOTAL. . . .(($3,315,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,465,000Sec. 3022. 2025 c 414 s 3112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESEnvironmental Mitigation Projects (40000586)Appropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($997,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,327,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$3,988,000TOTAL. . . .(($4,985,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,315,000Sec. 3023. 2025 c 414 s 3120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Trust Land Transfer Program (40000685)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a)(($16,650,000))$20,650,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. DNR-1-2025, developed April 26, 2025, and LEAP Capital Document No. DNR-1-2026, developed March 9, 2026.(b) $3,600,000 of the appropriation in this subsection is provided solely for the transfer of the Cape George parcel to Jefferson county, which is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The department may transfer title to the Cape George parcel to Jefferson county only on the conditions that (i) Jefferson county agrees to maintain the parcel as a structurally complex, carbon dense forest and subject to the requirements of the department's 1997 state trust lands habitat conservation plan, (ii) Jefferson county authorizes the department to initiate a pilot carbon offset project, including the conduct of related activities, such as feasibility studies and baseline assessments, utilizing the Cape George parcel, and (iii) to the extent the Cape George parcel may be used to generate carbon offset credits, the department retains the sole right to such credits, with revenues to be distributed in accordance with RCW 79.64.110.(2) $250,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to conduct an analysis of the ecological and conservation values of the Elwha watershed on department managed lands pursuant to the priorities and processes identified in chapters 79.70 and 79.71 RCW. The department shall provide a report to the house capital budget committee, senate ways and means committee, and the governor by October 1, 2026, that includes the following:(a) A Washington natural heritage program site survey to identify rare flora, native ecological communities, structurally complex forests, and scenic or other natural features worthy of consideration for conservation;(b) Identification of lands within the watershed that may be appropriate for conservation as a state natural area preserve as defined in RCW 79.70.020 or a natural resources conservation area under RCW 79.71.020;(c) Uses currently occurring in the area, including recreation and cultural practices;(d) A proposed boundary, if applicable, for any such proposed natural area for review by the natural heritage advisory council; and(e) An acknowledgment that any applicable proposed natural area boundary will be developed through the site establishment process as described in chapters 79.70 and 79.71 RCW.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$20,900,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$16,900,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($67,600,000))Â Â Â Â Â $83,600,000TOTAL. . . .(($84,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $104,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3024. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESTrust Land Revenue Report (92001602)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the department to develop and submit a report to the legislature, no later than December 1, 2026, with projected revenues by asset class for each of the next five fiscal years, 2027-2032, to the federal grant trusts, state forest transfer land trusts reported by individual county, and projected fund balances for the resource management account and the forest development account.Appropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$100,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$100,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3025. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREWSDA Plant Services Lab, Prosser (40000002)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,186,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,794,000TOTAL. . . .$10,980,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3026. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREClimate Smart Agriculture Equipment (92000008)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$4,636,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,544,000TOTAL. . . .$23,180,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3027. 2025 c 414 s 3117 (uncodified) is repealed.(End of part)PART 4TRANSPORTATIONNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATIONLower Columbia River Dredging Project (91000002)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for property acquisition and infrastructure costs associated with Washington sponsor ports' obligations under the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan.(2) It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate a total of $15,000,000 for this project in the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, with $10,000,000 of this amount funded in the 2026 supplemental transportation budget.(3) The legislature further intends that the sponsor ports develop a comprehensive financial plan that relies primarily on nonstate funding to support their obligations under the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan, and that development of the plan include consideration of economic and ecological uses for dredged material and sites, with input from relevant state agencies.(4) The appropriations made by the legislature through the capital and transportation budgets in this biennium do not obligate the legislature to provide future funding from the state for expenditures associated with the lower Columbia river channel maintenance plan in future biennia.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000(End of part)PART 5EDUCATIONSec. 5001. 2025 c 414 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Healthy Kids-Healthy Schools (40000147)The ((appropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) $12,000,000 of the appropriation of the common school construction fundâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for healthy kids and healthy schools grants for projects that are consistent with the healthiest next generation priorities.(b) The appropriation in this subsection (1) is provided solely for grant funding to school districts for the purchase of equipment or to make repairs to existing equipment that is related to improving: (i) Children's physical health, and may include, but is not limited to, fitness playground equipment, covered play areas, and physical education equipment or related structures or renovation; and (ii) children's nutrition, and may include, but is not limited to, garden related structures and greenhouses to provide students access to fresh produce, and kitchen equipment or upgrades.(c) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop criteria for grant funding under this subsection (1) that include, but are not limited to, the following requirements: (i) Districts may apply for grants, but no single district may receive more than $200,000 of the appropriation for grants awarded under this section; (ii) any district receiving funding provided in this section must demonstrate a consistent commitment to addressing school facilities' needs; and (iii) applicants with a high percentage of students who are eligible and enrolled in the free and reduced-price meals program may be prioritized.(2) (($1,000,000))$2,640,000 of the common school construction fundâstate appropriation and $860,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for grants to school districts, charter schools, and state-tribal education compact schools for the replacement of lead-contaminated pipes, drinking water fixtures, and the purchase of water filters, including the labor costs of remediation design, installation, and construction.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .(($13,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,640,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$860,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($52,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $62,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($65,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $77,500,000Sec. 5002. 2025 c 414 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Small District and STEC Schools Modernization Program (40000150)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($174,450,000))$196,255,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation, $31,027,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation, and $18,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section ((is))are provided solely for modernization grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159.(2) (($530,000))$804,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants for small school districts authorized under RCW 28A.525.159. Planning grants may not exceed $50,000 per district. Planning grants may only be awarded to school districts with an estimated total project cost of $6,000,000 or less. In awarding planning grants pursuant to this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must follow the list of planning grants submitted to the governor and the legislature for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, except that the office shall review the planning grant list for project redundancies and may not award planning grants for any project receiving design or construction funding appropriated in other sections of part 5 of this act.(3) $27,371,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for planning grants and modernization grants to state-tribal compact schools. The superintendent of public instruction may prioritize planning grants for state-tribal compact schools with the most serious building deficiencies and the most limited financial capacity.(4) The climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the projects in subsection (7) of this section to fund construction components and building equipment that improve energy efficiency or reduce greenhouse gas emissions, such as HVAC systems.(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a list of small school district modernization projects, as prioritized by the advisory committee under RCW 28A.525.159, to the legislature and the governor by September 15, 2026. The list must include: (a) A description of the project; (b) the proposed state funding level, not to exceed $6,000,000 per project, adjusted for inflation based on the office of financial management's C-100 form; (c) estimated total project costs; and (d) local funding resources.(((5)))(6) In the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, school districts receiving a small district modernization grant under this section may not combine this grant funding either with a school construction assistance program grant or with other grants awarded under this section to fund a single project.(((6)))(7) The appropriations in this section may be awarded only to projects approved by the legislature, as identified in LEAP Capital Document No. OSPI-1-2025, developed April 26, 2025, and LEAP Capital Document No. OSPI-1-2026 developed March 9, 2026.(((7)))(8) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$18,000,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .(($530,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,831,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($201,821,000))Â Â Â Â Â $223,626,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($202,351,000))Â Â Â Â Â $273,457,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($809,404,000))Â Â Â Â Â $872,136,000TOTAL. . . .(($1,011,755,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,145,593,000Sec. 5003. 2025 c 414 s 5009 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 School Construction Assistance Program (40000153)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($425,065,000))$445,578,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for school construction assistance grants for qualifying public school construction projects.(2) (($3,007,000))$2,914,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation and (($1,500,000))$2,290,000 of the common school construction accountâfederal appropriation in this section are provided solely for study and survey grants and for completing inventory and building condition assessments for public school districts every six years, and for the acquisition of art pursuant to RCW 28A.335.210.(3) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .(($3,007,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,914,000Common School Construction FundâFederal. . . .(($1,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,290,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($425,065,000))Â Â Â Â Â $445,578,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($429,572,000))Â Â Â Â Â $450,782,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($1,718,288,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,803,128,000TOTAL. . . .(($2,147,860,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,253,910,000Sec. 5004. 2025 c 414 s 5011 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 School Seismic Safety Grant Program (40000159)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the following school seismic safety project grants, as authorized under RCW 28A.525.320: (((1)))(a) The Cape Flattery - Neah Bay K-12 Campus Relocation project; (((2)))(b) the Taholah - K-12 School Relocation project; (((3)))(c) the North Beach - Ocean Shores Vertical Evacuation Tower project; ((and (4)))(d) the North Beach - Pacific Beach Elementary Relocation project; (e) the North Beach Junior/Senior High School project; and (f) the Hoquiam K-6 Consolidation project.(2) It is the intent of the legislature to provide $14,520,000 for the design costs for the Hoquiam Junior/Senior High School Consolidation project in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.(3) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($151,451,000))Â Â Â Â Â $165,351,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($605,804,000))Â Â Â Â Â $661,404,000TOTAL. . . .(($757,255,000))Â Â Â Â Â $826,755,000Sec. 5005. 2025 c 414 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSCAPR Transitional Projects (91002551)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to work with the office of the superintendent of public instruction and stakeholders to revise the school construction assistance program and to holistically examine the state's programmatic support of K-12 school construction through the planning process required under section 5011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024. Pursuant to this section, the legislature intends that this revision and examination will be completed in a manner that will modify and improve efficiencies within, and access to, the school construction assistance program, while also identifying cost-saving measures for awarding state grants for the construction and modernization of common school facilities. The legislature further intends that this revision and planning process will result in a prioritized list of school construction projects that recognizes the substantial variation between district sizes and financial capacities, and which categorizes reasonably comparable applicants into distinct school district groupings to foster a fair and equitable prioritization of projects. However, the legislature also recognizes that some school district projects will be ready to proceed to construction during this planning and revision period. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide funding to the school district projects listed in this section in recognition of this transitional period.(2) School districts receiving grant funding pursuant to this section may combine this funding with a school construction assistance program grant and must use available local resources to contribute financially to the completion of the project.(3) (($8,131,000))$5,304,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Pe Ell school district's K-12 school modernization project.(4) (($6,000,000))$4,568,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Bridgeport school district's Bridgeport elementary school modernization project.(5) (($3,972,000 of the common school construction accountâstate appropriation and)) $6,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section ((are))is provided solely for the Inchelium school district's K-12 school modernization project.(6) Grant funding provided to each school district in this section is contingent upon each of the applicable districts named in this section relinquishing all unspent construction grant funding previously awarded under section 7063 of this act.(7) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .(($18,103,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,872,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($24,103,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,872,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($24,103,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,872,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5006. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSCAP Enhancement Program Pilot (91002559)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement a pilot program for proposal No. five: Develop a SCAP enhancement program, as contained in the SCAP revision planning study published on the "Reports to the Legislature" page of the Washington state legislature's website, dated November 18, 2025, subject to the requirements of this section.(2) The office must award the following SCAP enhancement pilot program grants under this section to the following school districts: (a) $1,429,000 to the Garfield school district for the Garfield ES/MS project; (b) $1,507,000 to the Wellpinit school district for the Wellpinit elementary school project; and (c) $850,000 to the Wahkiakum school district for the Julius A. Wendt elementary school project.(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall inform school districts awarded a pilot program grant under this section that the legislature intends, in future biennia, that grant awards for the remaining project costs pursuant to this section will be determined according to the following parameters:(a) The school district property tax rate increment associated with the project will be not less than $1.35 per $1,000 of assessed property value and the state share of project costs will be calculated based on the remaining project costs not covered by this tax rate; and(b) The school district property tax rate threshold under (a) of this subsection, will be calculated based on the estimated annualized debt service costs for general obligation bonds issued with an average maturity of no less than 20 years and on the interest rate for state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of the pilot program grant award pursuant to this section.(c) The projects funded pursuant to this section must not exceed 110 percent of the statewide average cost per square foot for new construction or modernization, as applicable, and must be reviewed for compliance with this standard by the office of the superintendent of public instruction's technical advisory committee.(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall request design and construction funding for the school districts' projects listed in this section as part of the office's request for omnibus capital appropriations in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium. In this request, the office must provide calculations for the state and school district cost shares that demonstrate compliance with the legislative intent stated in subsection (3) of this section and information regarding project scope and budget.(5) The legislature intends that the pilot program grants in this section will enable the identified districts to develop school construction projects that will be financially supported by the districts and the state. The legislature further intends to fund only the three projects, as described in this section, on a pilot basis. It is the intent of the legislature to address the school construction fiscal policy issues in this section through future legislation.Appropriation:Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$850,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,936,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$3,786,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$100,000,000TOTAL. . . .$103,786,000Sec. 5007. 2025 c 414 s 5012 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONDistressed Schools (92001915)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $237,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Acme Elementary Modernization project.(2) $6,227,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Lawton Elementary School project.(3) $4,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation and $1,000,000 of the model toxics control capital accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for the Maritime 253: South Puget Sound Maritime Skills Center.(4) $3,500,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the TOPS K-8 School project.(5) $3,600,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Whitworth Orca K-8 School Roof Replacement project.(6) $140,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Eatonville High School - West Retaining Wall & Access project.(7) $166,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Eatonville High School - South Retaining Wall Improvement project.(8) $1,500,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Finley School District HVAC project.(9) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,500,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($13,964,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,870,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($14,964,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,370,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($55,856,000))Â Â Â Â Â $0TOTAL. . . .(($70,820,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,370,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5008. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONPower Plant Electrification & Campus Hot Water Loop - Phase 1 (40000213)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$47,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$47,500,000Sec. 5009. 2025 c 414 s 6342 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYSpokane Team Health Education Building (40000361)The ((reappropriation))appropriations in this section ((is))are subject to the following conditions and limitations: ((Washington State University must design the new facility to meet the original size estimate of 34,500 square feet))The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the design and renovation of a facility on the Spokane campus for team health education.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($4,191,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,786,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,809,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,214,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($7,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,000,000Sec. 5010. 2025 c 414 s 5035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000046)Appropriation:((Washington State University BuildingAccountâState. . . .$45,000,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$51,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($180,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $204,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($225,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $255,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5011. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYSoil Health Research Infrastructure (92001138)Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5012. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYEnsminger Pavilion Infrastructure (92001139)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$1,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5013. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYWSU Creamery Energy Efficiency (92001140)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5014. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYVirtual Fencing and Climate Resiliency (92001141)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$500,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5015. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYEWU Large Solar Array (40000234)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$7,134,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,134,000Sec. 5016. 2025 c 414 s 5040 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000031)Appropriation:((Eastern Washington University CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$9,800,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,800,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,800,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($63,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $97,788,000TOTAL. . . .(($79,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $117,588,000Sec. 5017. 2025 c 414 s 6359 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation 2023-2025 (40000128)Reappropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .(($1,481,000))Â Â Â Â Â $781,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$355,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($1,836,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,136,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$700,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,793,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,629,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5018. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYElectrical Grid Security Feeder 14 (40000206)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,491,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,491,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5019. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYNorth Academic Complex Moving Costs (91000029)Appropriation:Central Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$700,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$700,000Sec. 5020. 2025 c 414 s 5053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYPreventative Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs (40000012)Appropriation:Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .(($3,614,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,114,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,614,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$14,456,000TOTAL. . . .(($21,684,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,184,000Sec. 5021. 2025 c 414 s 5055 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYMinor Works Preservation and Program (91000014)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,340,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,900,000Western Washington University Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .(($4,660,000))Â Â Â Â Â $250,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,150,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($24,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,000,000TOTAL. . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,150,000Sec. 5022. 2025 c 414 s 5057 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYPreservation - Minor Works 2025-27 (40000182)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The Climate Commitment AccountâState appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Clean Building Energy Audit and Incentive Grant.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($40,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($2,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,325,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .(($2,040,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,365,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($8,160,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,460,000TOTAL. . . .(($10,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,825,000Sec. 5023. 2025 c 414 s 6703 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCascadia: CC5 Gateway building (40000222)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the construction of the CC5 Gateway Building on the condition that this project receives priority over new major project requests in the Board's 2027-2029 fiscal biennium capital budget submittal.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($819,000))Â Â Â Â Â $429,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,277,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,667,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $37,112,000TOTAL. . . .(($3,096,000))Â Â Â Â Â $45,208,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5024. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCommunity and Technical College Building Tune-up Program (40001338)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5025. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCTC Building HVAC Control-to-schedule Upgrades (40001339)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$8,000,000TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5026. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESSeattle Central EcoDistrict Decarbonization (40001348)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The state board for community and technical colleges, on behalf of Seattle central community college, shall negotiate an energy as a service contract, as defined in RCW 39.35C.010, to complete this project without additional state capital funding.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$11,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$7,820,000TOTAL. . . .$18,820,000(End of part)PART 6REAPPROPRIATIONSNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6001. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Energy and Energy Freedom Program (30000726)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6003, chapter 4, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,148,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$110,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,258,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,142,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,400,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6002. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Energy Funds 3 (30000881)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1007, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,607,000Energy Efficiency AccountâState. . . .$2,106,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$10,713,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$32,987,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$43,700,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6003. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEnergy Efficiency and Solar Grants (30000882)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6007, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Energy Efficiency AccountâState. . . .$12,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$10,988,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6004. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Energy Transition 4 (40000042)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1005, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,276,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$511,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$5,787,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$26,813,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$32,600,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6005. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2019-21 Energy Efficiency and Solar Grants Program (40000049)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1023, chapter 356, Laws of 2020.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$533,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$11,967,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,500,000Sec. 6006. 2025 c 414 s 6013 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2020 Local and Community Projects (40000116)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6010, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7010 of this act, except that funding for the Outdoors for All and the George Davis Creek Fish Passage (Sammamish) projects under this appropriation has lapsed.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($23,618,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,693,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($142,689,000))Â Â Â Â Â $146,099,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($166,307,000))Â Â Â Â Â $164,792,000Sec. 6007. 2025 c 414 s 6015 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021 Local and Community Projects (40000130)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, except that funding for the Wishkah flood wall project and the Remstead Regional Park project under this appropriation has lapsed.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($6,164,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,291,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($26,508,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,995,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($32,672,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,286,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6008. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Energy Retrofits for Public Buildings Grant Program (40000149)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7011, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,497,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$8,460,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$9,957,000Sec. 6009. 2025 c 414 s 6029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Local & Community Projects (40000230)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1001, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, ((as amended by section 7012 of this act))except that funding for the Remstead Regional Park, Stonehenge Maryhill Museum Repair (Maryhill), SE 168th St. Bike Lanes/Safe Crossings (Renton), Renton Housing Repair Assistance Program (Renton), and the Peter Kirk Community Center Roof and Retrofitted Emerg (Kirkland) projects under this appropriation has lapsed.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($58,682,000))Â Â Â Â Â $55,574,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$111,885,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($170,567,000))Â Â Â Â Â $167,459,000Sec. 6010. 2025 c 414 s 6032 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023 Local and Community Projects (40000266)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 6009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, ((as amended by section 7013 of this act))except that the Willows Road Pedestrian Safety Connection (Kirkland) project is renamed the Road Pedestrian Safety Connections project.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$18,805,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$34,522,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$53,327,000Sec. 6011. 2025 c 414 s 6038 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Energy Retrofits and Solar Power for Public Buildings (40000283)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7017 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($49,077,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,550,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,923,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,450,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$51,000,000Sec. 6012. 2025 c 414 s 6039 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHome Electrification and Appliance Rebates Program (HEAR) (40000284)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1008, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($56,200,000))Â Â Â Â Â $33,322,000General FundâFederal. . . .(($82,945,000))Â Â Â Â Â $82,849,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($139,145,000))Â Â Â Â Â $116,171,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($23,855,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,829,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$163,000,000Sec. 6013. 2025 c 414 s 6043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Weatherization Plus Health (40000291)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1014, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($16,492,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,913,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,323,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($18,815,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,236,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($21,185,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,764,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000Sec. 6014. 2025 c 414 s 6045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000294)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1006, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($48,164,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,714,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,836,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,286,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000Sec. 6015. 2025 c 414 s 6046 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Housing Trust Fund (40000295)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7020 of this act, except that funding for the African diaspora cultural anchor village (SeaTac), CoLead Northgate project in Seattle, and Crail Cottages projects under this appropriation has lapsed.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($85,137,000))Â Â Â Â Â $84,889,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($351,043,000))Â Â Â Â Â $339,792,000Washington Housing Trust AccountâState. . . .$8,500,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($444,680,000))Â Â Â Â Â $433,181,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$82,859,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($527,539,000))Â Â Â Â Â $516,040,000Sec. 6016. 2025 c 414 s 6047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Connecting Housing to Infrastructure (CHIP) (40000296)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($53,481,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,694,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$26,787,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$53,481,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,519,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$60,000,000Sec. 6017. 2025 c 414 s 6049 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Behavioral Health Community Capacity Grants (40000299)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1009, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, except that funding for the Whatcom 23-Hour Crisis Relief Center (Bellingham) project under this appropriation has lapsed.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .$1,250,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($265,017,000))Â Â Â Â Â $253,667,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($266,267,000))Â Â Â Â Â $254,917,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$36,059,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($302,326,000))Â Â Â Â Â $290,976,000Sec. 6018. 2025 c 414 s 6051 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2024 Local and Community Projects (40000301)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1011, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7022 of this act, except that funding for the ODT land purchase, Snoqualmie Indian Tribe Consultation, SPARC Capital Campaign (Mount Vernon), Oak Harbor Economic Development (Oak Harbor), Cedarwood Community Recreation Center Redevelopment (Lake Stevens), and the South Seattle Community Food Hub projects under this appropriation has lapsed.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$2,400,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($166,569,000))Â Â Â Â Â $131,399,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($168,969,000))Â Â Â Â Â $133,799,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($66,474,000))Â Â Â Â Â $97,751,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($235,443,000))Â Â Â Â Â $231,550,000Sec. 6019. 2025 c 414 s 6052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCETribal Climate Adaptation Pass-through Grants (40000421)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1027, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($43,076,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,606,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($6,924,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,394,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000Sec. 6020. 2025 c 414 s 6053 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEDOE Hydrogen Hub -State Match (40000561)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($10,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,266,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($9,885,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,734,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$20,000,000Sec. 6021. 2025 c 414 s 6058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGreen Jobs and Infrastructure Grants (40000604)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($24,082,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,470,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($918,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,530,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000Sec. 6022. 2025 c 414 s 6060 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025 Local and Community Projects (40000614)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7023 of this act, except that funding for the South Seattle Community Food Hub, Bremerton Mason County Sewer Expansion, District Distributed Antenna System Installation, and Seattle Storm Center projects under this appropriation has lapsed.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($7,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,000Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$3,875,000Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState. . . .$5,122,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($53,214,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,303,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($62,218,000))Â Â Â Â Â $51,308,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($6,347,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,364,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($68,565,000))Â Â Â Â Â $64,672,000Sec. 6023. 2025 c 414 s 6061 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community Solar Resilience Hubs (40000620)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1019, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($31,212,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,064,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($6,788,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,936,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6024. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community Solar (40000621)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1020, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$2,859,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$3,141,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$6,000,000Sec. 6025. 2025 c 414 s 6062 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2023-25 Community EV Charging (40000622)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1021, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7024 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($77,502,000))Â Â Â Â Â $64,612,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($27,498,000))Â Â Â Â Â $40,388,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$105,000,000Sec. 6026. 2025 c 414 s 6069 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Dental Capacity Grants (91001660)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1043, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that funding for the ICHS Holly Park project under this appropriation has lapsed.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($2,698,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,593,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,527,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,526,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($6,225,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,119,000Sec. 6027. 2025 c 414 s 6070 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2021-23 Early Learning Facilities (91001677)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1037, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($13,618,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,665,000Ruth LeCocq Kagi Early Learning FacilitiesDevelopment AccountâState. . . .$9,065,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$19,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($22,702,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,749,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$39,798,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($62,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $59,547,000Sec. 6028. 2025 c 414 s 6073 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEGrants for Affordable Housing Development Connections (91001685)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1032, chapter 296, Laws of 2022 except the Port Townsend Utility Connect project is not subject to the requirement that affordable housing development begin construction within 24 months of the grant award.Reappropriation:Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery FundâFederal. . . .$7,864,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,217,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$16,081,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$29,219,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,300,000Sec. 6029. 2025 c 414 s 6078 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHomeless Youth Facilities (91001991)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1048, chapter 296, Laws of 2022, except that funding for the communities of color coalition (Everett) project has lapsed, and no further funding may be provided for that project.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($8,666,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,347,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$6,229,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($14,895,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,576,000Sec. 6030. 2025 c 414 s 6080 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELocal Emission Reduction Projects (91002184)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($27,156,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,713,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($6,975,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,655,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($34,131,000))Â Â Â Â Â $26,368,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($4,539,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,302,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$38,670,000Sec. 6031. 2025 c 414 s 6085 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEMultifamily Bldg Efficiency Grants (91002449)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1028, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($54,981,000))Â Â Â Â Â $54,461,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($19,000))Â Â Â Â Â $539,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$55,000,000Sec. 6032. 2025 c 414 s 6086 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEClean Building Performance Grants (91002451)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1029, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($45,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,979,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $5,021,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,000,000Sec. 6033. 2025 c 414 s 6090 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEHard-to-Decarbonize Sector & Economic Development Grants (91002641)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1033, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($47,394,000))Â Â Â Â Â $42,337,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,406,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,463,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$49,800,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6034. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Broadband Office (92001178)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7017, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$19,875,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$30,125,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$50,000,000Sec. 6035. 2025 c 414 s 6097 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2022 Crisis Stabilization Facilities (92001286)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1025, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($25,689,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,736,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$22,613,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($48,302,000))Â Â Â Â Â $47,349,000Sec. 6036. 2025 c 414 s 6098 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEPort of Everett (92001364)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1042, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($4,948,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,400,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($52,000))Â Â Â Â Â $600,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000Sec. 6037. 2025 c 414 s 6101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCELarge Scale Solar Innovation Projects (92001669)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1040, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($38,917,000))Â Â Â Â Â $36,108,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($83,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,892,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$39,000,000Sec. 6038. 2025 c 414 s 6102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCEEnergy Northwest (92001720)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 1037, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $24,986,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $14,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000Sec. 6039. 2025 c 414 s 6126 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONNorthwest Region Training Facility Renovation and Upgrades (40000042)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,082,000))Â Â Â Â Â $782,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$300,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$1,082,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,082,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6040. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSIONRegional Training Facilities (92000006)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for the Spokane Academy Expansion project.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,150,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,164,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,314,000Sec. 6041. 2025 c 414 s 6131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIESSolar Panel Installation - Lab & Training Facility (40000015)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($1,637,000))Â Â Â Â Â $332,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,097,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,402,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,734,000Sec. 6042. 2025 c 414 s 6174 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESChild Study and Treatment Center-Ketron: LSA Expansion (40000411)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($2,731,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,226,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($269,000))Â Â Â Â Â $278,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,504,000Sec. 6043. 2025 c 414 s 6187 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESEastern State Hospital-Commissary: Building Repairs (40000606)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($810,000))Â Â Â Â Â $772,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,350,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($4,160,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,122,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($290,000))Â Â Â Â Â $328,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,450,000Sec. 6044. 2025 c 414 s 6194 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESStatewide: Clean Buildings Act (40000960)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($3,133,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,889,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($594,000))Â Â Â Â Â $838,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,727,000Sec. 6045. 2025 c 414 s 6195 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICESYakima Valley School-Main Building: Exterior Window Replacement (40000962)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($5,204,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,081,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($126,000))Â Â Â Â Â $249,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,330,000Sec. 6046. 2025 c 414 s 6230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWVH HVAC Retrofit (40000006)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,000))Â Â Â Â Â $874,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($745,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,676,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($750,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,550,000Sec. 6047. 2025 c 414 s 6235 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSWSVC - Burial and Columbarium Expansion Grant (40000092)Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .(($4,839,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,084,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($79,000))Â Â Â Â Â $502,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($4,918,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,586,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($491,000))Â Â Â Â Â $823,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,409,000Sec. 6048. 2025 c 414 s 6237 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSDVA ARPA Federal Funds & State Match (91000013)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 2013, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$24,515,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,055,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .$34,570,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$7,639,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($42,209,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,154,000Sec. 6049. 2025 c 414 s 6256 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONSWCC: Interim Mental Health Building (40000260)Reappropriation:Capital Community Assistance AccountâState. . . .(($625,000))Â Â Â Â Â $430,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,207,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($1,832,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,637,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$415,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($2,247,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,052,000Sec. 6050. 2025 c 414 s 6275 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSkills Centers Minor Works (40000023)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($216,000))Â Â Â Â Â $217,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,784,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,783,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000Sec. 6051. 2025 c 414 s 6285 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2023-25 Small District and State Tribal Compact Schools Modernization (40000065)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5003, chapter 375, Laws of 2024, as amended by section 7072 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($3,630,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,300,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$128,368,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,717,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($142,715,000))Â Â Â Â Â $145,385,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($69,165,000))Â Â Â Â Â $69,495,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($211,880,000))Â Â Â Â Â $214,880,000Sec. 6052. 2025 c 414 s 6292 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONSchool District Indoor Air Quality & Energy Efficiency (40000104)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5007, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($30,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $29,934,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$14,472,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($44,472,000))Â Â Â Â Â $44,406,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($553,000))Â Â Â Â Â $619,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$45,025,000Sec. 6053. 2025 c 414 s 6297 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTIONEnergy Assessment Grants to School Districts (91000509)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5008, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($4,900,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,925,000Common School Construction FundâState. . . .$50,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($4,950,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,975,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $1,975,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,950,000Sec. 6054. 2025 c 414 s 6327 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Clean Energy Testbeds (40000098)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5015, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($2,501,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,239,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($4,999,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,261,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,500,000Sec. 6055. 2025 c 414 s 6333 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONInfrastructure Renewal (40000132)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($6,296,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,715,000University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$8,499,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($14,795,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,214,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($9,380,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,961,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,175,000Sec. 6056. 2025 c 414 s 6344 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYDecarbonization Planning (91000043)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5021, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($3,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,076,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $1,924,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,000,000Sec. 6057. 2025 c 414 s 6345 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITYKnott Dairy Center Digester (92001132)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5022, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($10,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,256,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $744,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000Sec. 6058. 2025 c 414 s 6354 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYNutrition Science (30000456)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($210,000))Â Â Â Â Â $256,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($59,370,000))Â Â Â Â Â $59,324,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$59,580,000Sec. 6059. 2025 c 414 s 5041 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHumanities & Social Science Complex (40000081)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($5,139,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,271,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$45,825,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($50,964,000))Â Â Â Â Â $49,096,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$11,158,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($46,841,000))Â Â Â Â Â $48,709,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$108,963,000Sec. 6060. 2025 c 414 s 5043 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYSecondary Geothermal Module (40000161)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for Central Washington University to design and construct the smaller-scale geothermal system that was presented to the governor and the legislature for consideration during the 2024 legislative session.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($11,830,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,747,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($634,000))Â Â Â Â Â $717,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$16,464,000Sec. 6061. 2025 c 414 s 6362 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHB 1390 â District Energy Systems (91000024)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($55,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($745,000))Â Â Â Â Â $799,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$800,000Sec. 6062. 2025 c 414 s 5052 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYHeating Conversion Project (40000005)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($8,911,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,596,000Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$41,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,089,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,404,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$164,000,000TOTAL. . . .$215,000,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6063. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETYMinor Works: Preservation 2021-23 (40000041)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$108,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$670,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$778,000Sec. 6064. 2025 c 414 s 6416 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2019-21 Columbia River Water Supply Development Program (40000152)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3087, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:Columbia River Basin Water Supply RevenueRecovery AccountâState. . . .(($1,464,000))Â Â Â Â Â $393,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($9,371,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,338,000State Taxable Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,990,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($20,825,000))Â Â Â Â Â $22,721,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($19,175,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,279,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000Sec. 6065. 2025 c 414 s 6463 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2023-25 Floodplains by Design (40000540)Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($16,972,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,817,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$47,320,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($64,292,000))Â Â Â Â Â $64,137,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,255,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$67,392,000Sec. 6066. 2025 c 414 s 6475 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYImproving Air Quality in Overburdened Communities Initiative (40000606)Reappropriation:Air Quality and Health Disparities ImprovementAccountâState. . . .(($20,646,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,374,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($754,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,026,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$21,400,000Sec. 6067. 2025 c 414 s 6476 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYLandfill Methane Capture (40000611)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 7056 of this act.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($9,697,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,476,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($403,000))Â Â Â Â Â $624,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,100,000Sec. 6068. 2025 c 414 s 6482 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2021-23 Water Banking (91000373)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 6027, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($3,707,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,437,000State Drought Preparedness and Response AccountâState. . . .$8,606,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($12,313,000))Â Â Â Â Â $12,043,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,687,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($14,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,730,000Sec. 6069. 2025 c 414 s 6483 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYPSCAA Ultra-fine Particle Monitoring (91000378)Reappropriation:Air Quality and Health Disparities ImprovementAccountâState. . . .(($29,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($371,000))Â Â Â Â Â $380,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$400,000Sec. 6070. 2025 c 414 s 6484 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYDDT Soil Remediation Pilot (91000383)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3038, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($4,548,000))Â Â Â Â Â $301,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$452,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $753,000Sec. 6071. 2025 c 414 s 6492 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMUnderground Storage Tank Capital Financing Assistance Pgm 2019-21 (30000702)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .(($10,645,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,645,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,855,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($12,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,500,000Sec. 6072. 2025 c 414 s 6495 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM2023-25 Heating Oil Capital Financing Assistance Program (40000003)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .(($7,465,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,465,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$535,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($8,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,000,000Sec. 6073. 2025 c 414 s 6496 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAMUnderground Storage Tank Capital Financial Assistance Pgm 2017-19 (92000001)Reappropriation:Pollution Liability Insurance Agency UndergroundStorage Tank Revolving AccountâState. . . .(($7,883,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,883,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,817,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($12,700,000))Â Â Â Â Â $10,700,000Sec. 6074. 2025 c 414 s 6506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONPreservation Minor Works 2019-21 (40000151)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($271,000))Â Â Â Â Â $216,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$4,176,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($4,447,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,392,000Sec. 6075. 2025 c 414 s 6514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSIONFort Worden Geothermal Heating (40000457)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($1,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $902,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $98,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000Sec. 6076. 2025 c 414 s 6521 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION2023-25 State Parks Capital Projects Pool (92001128)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3054, chapter 474, Laws of 2023, except that the Lake Sylvia Culvert Replacement project is removed from the list of eligible projects and $2,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation is provided solely for the Palouse to Cascades Rosalia Improvements project.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($975,000))Â Â Â Â Â $657,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$19,519,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($20,494,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,176,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($4,429,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,747,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$24,923,000Sec. 6077. 2025 c 414 s 6526 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2017-19 Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000409)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3034, chapter 296, Laws of 2022.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .(($3,829,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,809,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .(($4,889,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,330,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .(($3,529,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,956,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($12,247,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,095,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($67,753,000))Â Â Â Â Â $68,905,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$80,000,000Sec. 6078. 2025 c 414 s 6542 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000009)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,240,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,624,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($44,267,000))Â Â Â Â Â $43,883,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$49,507,000Sec. 6079. 2025 c 414 s 6544 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2019-21 - Washington Coastal Restoration Initiative (40000011)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3208, chapter 413, Laws of 2019.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($567,000))Â Â Â Â Â $649,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($11,519,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,437,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$12,086,000Sec. 6080. 2025 c 414 s 6553 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2021-23 - Youth Athletic Facilities (40000027)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3217, chapter 332, Laws of 2021.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($4,376,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,695,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($6,851,000))Â Â Â Â Â $6,532,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$11,227,000Sec. 6081. 2025 c 414 s 6564 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Washington Wildlife Recreation Program (40000053)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3018, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .(($8,592,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,635,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .(($49,418,000))Â Â Â Â Â $44,585,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .(($41,600,000))Â Â Â Â Â $38,023,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($99,610,000))Â Â Â Â Â $91,243,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($20,390,000))Â Â Â Â Â $28,757,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,000,000Sec. 6082. 2025 c 414 s 6565 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Grant Programs (40000054)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3012, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:General FundâFederal. . . .$67,466,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($25,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,615,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$14,976,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($107,442,000))Â Â Â Â Â $106,057,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($12,558,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,943,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$120,000,000Sec. 6083. 2025 c 414 s 6572 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000061)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3063, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($10,115,000))Â Â Â Â Â $8,008,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($27,812,000))Â Â Â Â Â $31,489,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($37,927,000))Â Â Â Â Â $39,497,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($21,238,000))Â Â Â Â Â $19,668,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$59,165,000Sec. 6084. 2025 c 414 s 6573 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000062)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3016, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($11,110,000))Â Â Â Â Â $11,028,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$9,654,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($20,764,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,682,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($4,655,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,737,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,419,000Sec. 6085. 2025 c 414 s 6574 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000063)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3014, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($7,928,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,852,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,704,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($15,632,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,556,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,430,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,506,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$18,062,000Sec. 6086. 2025 c 414 s 6575 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000064)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3015, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($36,487,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,298,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$21,023,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($57,510,000))Â Â Â Â Â $56,321,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($13,095,000))Â Â Â Â Â $14,284,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$70,605,000Sec. 6087. 2025 c 414 s 6579 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2023-25 Family Forest Fish Passage Program (40000068)Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($5,093,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,372,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($2,687,000))Â Â Â Â Â $3,408,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$7,780,000Sec. 6088. 2025 c 414 s 6588 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICESalmon Recovery Funding Board: Riparian Grant Program (91001679)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3074, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($24,854,000))Â Â Â Â Â $23,496,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($146,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,504,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,000,000Sec. 6089. 2025 c 414 s 6609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSIONRiparian Restoration with Landowners (91000020)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 7056, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($21,938,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,258,000Salmon Recovery AccountâState. . . .$1,294,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($23,232,000))Â Â Â Â Â $16,552,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($11,768,000))Â Â Â Â Â $18,448,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000Sec. 6090. 2025 c 414 s 6664 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2023-25 Minor Works Preservation (40000154)Reappropriation:Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .(($433,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,180,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($4,613,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,197,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,430,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,516,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($6,043,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,713,000Sec. 6091. 2025 c 414 s 6673 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESDrought Resilience Infrastructure Investments (40000411)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 3031, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $486,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$247,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($747,000))Â Â Â Â Â $733,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($3,000))Â Â Â Â Â $17,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$750,000Sec. 6092. 2025 c 414 s 6674 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESRecreational Target Shooting Pilot Sites (40000413)Reappropriation:Firearms Range AccountâState. . . .(($900,000))Â Â Â Â Â $654,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$900,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($1,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,554,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .(($1,800,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,554,000Sec. 6093. 2025 c 414 s 6677 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESEncumbered Lands - Acquisition (91000323)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3034, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($15,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $14,500,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$15,000,000Sec. 6094. 2025 c 414 s 6680 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESWildfire Reforestation ((Grants)) (92000063)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3035, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($8,971,000))Â Â Â Â Â $7,756,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($1,029,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,244,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$10,000,000Sec. 6095. 2025 c 414 s 6681 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREAgricultural Carbon Storage and Sequestration (40000001)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3038, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,318,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $2,682,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,000,000Sec. 6096. 2023 c 474 s 6495 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEMSouth Seattle: Automotive Technology Renovation and Expansion (30000988)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($1,444,000))Â Â Â Â Â $484,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($24,433,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,393,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$25,877,000Sec. 6097. 2025 c 414 s 6688 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESShoreline: Allied Health, Science & Manufacturing Replacement (30000990)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($893,000))Â Â Â Â Â $901,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($46,547,000))Â Â Â Â Â $46,539,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$47,440,000Sec. 6098. 2025 c 414 s 6693 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESSpokane: Apprenticeship Center (40000107)Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($2,995,000))Â Â Â Â Â $2,996,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($373,000))Â Â Â Â Â $372,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,368,000Sec. 6099. 2025 c 414 s 6709 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works - Infrastructure Replacement (23-25) (40000721)The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the provisions of section 5033, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Community and Technical College Capital ProjectsAccountâState. . . .$1,397,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($4,130,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,266,000Subtotal Reappropriation. . . .(($5,527,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,663,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($34,773,000))Â Â Â Â Â $34,637,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$40,300,000Sec. 6100. 2025 c 414 s 6711 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCBPS SBCTC Statewide: Utility Submeters for Clean Buildings Act (40000878)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($7,822,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,188,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($722,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,356,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,544,000Sec. 6101. 2025 c 414 s 6712 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESCTC Energy Efficiency Program (40000880)The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 5036, chapter 375, Laws of 2024.Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($2,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $1,958,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $42,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$2,000,000Sec. 6102. 2025 c 414 s 6714 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESHB 1390 - District Energy Systems (91000443)Reappropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($907,000))Â Â Â Â Â $367,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .(($0))Â Â Â Â Â $540,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$907,000NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6103. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2025 c 414 s 6067 (uncodified);(2) 2025 c 414 s 6152 (uncodified);(3) 2025 c 414 s 6175 (uncodified);(4) 2025 c 414 s 6238 (uncodified);(5) 2025 c 414 s 6353 (uncodified);(6) 2025 c 414 s 6499 (uncodified);(7) 2025 c 414 s 6505 (uncodified); and(8) 2025 c 414 s 6617 (uncodified).(End of part)PART 7ACCOUNT CHANGESSec. 7001. 2025 c 414 s 1016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Energy Retrofits for Public Buildings Grants (40000670)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($10,000,000))$11,000,000 of the ((climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $1,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to local governments, public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments, and state agencies for facility improvements and related projects that result in energy and operational cost savings.(a) At least 20 percent of each competitive grant round is designated for awards to eligible projects in small cities or towns with a population of 5,000 or fewer residents.(b) In each competitive round, a higher energy savings to investment ratio must result in a higher project ranking. Priority consideration must be given to applicants that have not received grant awards for this purpose in prior biennia.(c) The department must determine a minimum match ratio to maximize the leverage of nonstate funds.(2) $5,000,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is provided solely for energy efficiency and environmental performance improvements to minor works, stand-alone, and emergency projects at facilities owned by state agencies that repair or replace existing building systems and reduce greenhouse gas emissions from state operations, including, but not limited to, HVAC, lighting, insulation, windows, and other mechanical systems. Eligibility for this funding is dependent on an analysis using the office of financial management's life-cycle cost tool that compares project design alternatives for initial and long-term cost-effectiveness. Assuming a reasonable return on investment, the department shall provide grants in the amount required to improve the project's energy efficiency compared to the original project request.(3) The department shall develop metrics that indicate the performance of energy efficiency efforts.(4) If a grant is provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this section to purchase heating devices or systems, the agency must, whenever possible and most cost effective, select devices and systems that do not use fossil fuels.(5) Grants provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section to state agencies are exempt from the match requirements in this section.(6) $4,000,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Seattle Central College EcoDistrict project.(7) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($10,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,000,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$20,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000Sec. 7002. 2025 c 414 s 1022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Clean Energy Fund Program (40000679)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) $26,000,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is provided solely for competitive grants to eligible entities for predevelopment, design, and construction of projects that provide a public benefit through research, development, demonstration, or deployment of clean energy technologies that save energy and reduce energy costs, reduce harmful air emissions, or increase energy independence for the state. Priority must be given to projects that benefit vulnerable populations and overburdened communities, including tribes.(2) Entities eligible for grant funding under this section include local governments, federally recognized tribal governments and tribes' contracted service providers, public and private utilities that serve retail customers in the state, for-profit entities, research institutions, nonprofit organizations, and state agencies.(3) To be eligible, a project must be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted under chapter 43.21F RCW and policies under chapter 19.405 RCW. To the extent practicable, the department must prioritize projects that build upon Washington's strengths in aerospace, maritime, information and communications technology, grid modernization, advanced materials, and decarbonizing the built environment.(4) The department must invite stakeholders to participate in the design and implementation of grant programs funded under this section. The department must consider equity and environmental justice when developing the program structure and opportunities for applicant participation.(5) When soliciting and evaluating proposals, awarding contracts, and monitoring projects under this section, the department must:(a) Ensure that competitive processes, rather than sole source contracting processes, are used to select all projects;(b) Ensure that a public benefit results from the use of public funds through due diligence and monitoring of contracted projects, including ensuring compliance with all applicable laws related to the project selection process, project monitoring, and contracting; and(c) Prioritize projects for funding that leverage the greatest amount of matching funds, such as local levy funding.(6)(a) The department must require project applicants to:(i) Disclose all sources of public funding invested in a project; and(ii) Identify by name any former or current state of Washington employees employed by the applicant or its governing body in the 24 months preceding the application submittal. The identification must include the person's separation date and job title or position held. If the department determines that a conflict of interest or other violation of chapter 42.52 RCW exists, the application must be disqualified from further consideration.(b) If, after a grant has been awarded, the department finds that a grantee has violated chapter 42.52 RCW, either in procuring or performing under the grant, the department in its sole discretion may terminate the grant funding by written notice. If the grant is terminated, the department must reserve its right to pursue all available remedies under law to address the violation.(7) The department must specify the requirements in subsections (5) and (6) of this section in funding contracts entered into by the department under this section.(8) $5,000,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants to tribes for clean energy development projects. Eligible uses of grant funding include planning, predesign, design, construction, project predevelopment, and deployment of clean energy projects that contribute to achieving the state's greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and related policies. The department must collaborate with tribes in the design and development of this grant program.(9) $4,000,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Pacific Northwest national laboratory test bed. The appropriation in this subsection is contingent upon the receipt of federal funding in sufficient amounts to complete the project.(10) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$31,000,000))Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($4,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $35,000,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$35,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$140,000,000TOTAL. . . .$175,000,000Sec. 7003. 2025 c 414 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE2025-27 Solar and Energy Storage Grants (40000682)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($15,000,000))$20,000,000 of the ((climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $5,000,000 of the state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section ((are))is provided for grants to increase the deployment of distributed solar and battery energy storage systems to enhance grid resilience, provide backup power for critical needs, and reduce energy costs. Projects may be solar energy systems, battery energy storage, or solar paired with battery energy storage. Funding may also be used to enable electric utility demand response programs that include customer-sited solar and battery energy storage systems. Eligible uses of the amounts provided in this section include, but are not limited to, planning and predevelopment work with communities.(2) Entities eligible for grant funding under this section include public higher education institutions, school districts, tribal governments and tribal entities, state and local governments, nonprofit organizations, and entities participating in federally funded solar programs administered by the department.(3)(a) For energy storage projects, the department must prioritize facilities that serve community members during power outages or provide critical infrastructure; and(b) Are grid-connected.(4) The department may:(a) Provide information to applicants about available clean energy tax credits and incentives, including elective pay, that may be applicable to the project for which state funding is being sought;(b) Inquire, as part of the application, which tax credits and incentives the applicant plans to seek for the project;(c) Prioritize projects seeking any applicable clean energy tax credits and incentives when developing and applying competitive criteria for selecting recipients under this section; and(d) Consider the availability of any federal tax credits or other federal or nonfederal grants or incentives that the applicant may benefit from in review of the application.(5) Funding awards made under this section may not exceed 100 percent of the cost of the project.(6) $650,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is provided solely for the Northshore Senior Center Battery Storage project.(7) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,650,000))Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($15,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $20,650,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$20,650,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$82,600,000TOTAL. . . .$103,250,000Sec. 7004. 2025 c 414 s 2028 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSTransitional Housing Program Roosevelt Barracks HVAC Replacement (40000114)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$5,576,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,576,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$5,576,000Sec. 7005. 2025 c 414 s 2029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRSTransitional Housing Program Betsy Ross Building HVAC Replacement (40000116)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$4,356,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,356,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$4,356,000Sec. 7006. 2025 c 414 s 2035 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIESEcho Glen Upper Campus Main Boiler HVAC Replacement (40000593)Appropriation:Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .$8,200,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,200,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$8,200,000Sec. 7007. 2025 c 414 s 3019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Floodplains by Design (40000660)The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$59,629,000))Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($16,154,000))Â Â Â Â Â $75,783,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$75,783,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$303,132,000TOTAL. . . .$378,915,000Sec. 7008. 2025 c 414 s 3022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Yakima River Basin Water Supply (40000705)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$52,020,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$52,020,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$208,080,000TOTAL. . . .$260,100,000Sec. 7009. 2025 c 414 s 3026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY2025-27 Chehalis Basin Strategy (40000724)The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) (($67,779,000))$69,779,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate and $2,000,000 of the natural climate solutions accountâstate)) appropriation in this section ((are))is provided solely for Chehalis Basin board-approved projects:(a) To protect and restore aquatic species habitat, including: Construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; postconstruction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties;(b) To reduce flood damage, including: Construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition project planning and development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; completion of environmental review and endangered species act consultation on the proposed flood protection facility; refinement and evaluation of the local action non-dam alternative; and engagement of state agencies, tribes, project sponsors, landowners, and other parties; and(c) That advance both the habitat restoration and the flood damage reduction goals of the Chehalis Basin strategy using a multibenefit approach, including: Community outreach and education; construction and property acquisition; preconstruction and acquisition planning and project development, feasibility, design, environmental review, and permitting; postconstruction and acquisition monitoring and adaptive management; and engagement of federal, state, and local agencies, tribes, conservation partners, landowners, and other parties.(2) $5,250,000 of the ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is provided solely for the staffing and operations of the office of Chehalis Basin and Chehalis Basin board to oversee the development, implementation, and amendment of the Chehalis Basin strategy, and this is the maximum amount the board may expend for this purpose. Oversight operations include, but are not limited to: Providing financial accountability, project management, technical assistance of grants and contracts associated with the subprojects funded through this section, and board meeting administration and facilitation.(3) Specific projects must be approved by at least six of the seven voting members of the Chehalis Basin board. The Chehalis Basin board has the discretion to allocate the funding between subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section as needed to meet the objectives of this appropriation and if approved by at least six of the seven voting members of the board. However, $5,250,000 is the maximum amount the department may expend for the purposes of subsection (2) of this section.(4) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($2,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $75,029,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$73,029,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$75,029,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$300,116,000TOTAL. . . .$375,145,000Sec. 7010. 2025 c 414 s 3029 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGYNorth Shore Levee (92000200)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.(2) The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 7059 of this act.Reappropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,467,000Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$17,000,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$17,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$1,033,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$35,500,000Sec. 7011. 2025 c 414 s 3056 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Washington Wildlife Recreation Program (40000548)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-1-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) The appropriations in this section are subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Farm and Forest AccountâState. . . .(($12,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $377,000Habitat Conservation AccountâState. . . .(($54,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $5,000,000Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$60,623,000Outdoor Recreation AccountâState. . . .$54,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$120,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$480,000,000TOTAL. . . .$600,000,000Sec. 7012. 2025 c 414 s 3058 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Salmon Recovery Funding Board Riparian Grant Programs (40000552)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations: (1) The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(2) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$20,000,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$20,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$80,000,000TOTAL. . . .$100,000,000Sec. 7013. 2025 c 414 s 3059 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (40000554)The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-2-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation office may retain a portion of the funds appropriated to projects for the administration of grants. The portion of funds retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(3) The Puget Sound partnership may retain up to $250,000 of the funds appropriated in this section for program administration.(4) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($10,100,000))Â Â Â Â Â $60,538,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$50,438,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$60,538,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$242,152,000TOTAL. . . .$302,690,000Sec. 7014. 2025 c 414 s 3063 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Brian Abbott Fish Barrier Removal Board (40000564)The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-6-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the total grant award.(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(4) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$27,002,000))Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($5,143,000))Â Â Â Â Â $32,545,000((State Taxable Building ConstructionAccountâState. . . .$400,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$32,545,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$130,180,000TOTAL. . . .$162,725,000Sec. 7015. 2025 c 414 s 3064 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (40000566)(1) The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations: The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. ((RCO-7-2025))RCO-2-2026, developed ((April 26, 2025))March 9, 2026.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funds retained for administration may not exceed three percent of the total grant award.(3) The department of fish and wildlife may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for technical assistance in developing projects for consideration. The portion of the funds retained for technical assistance may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(4) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($8,997,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,665,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$6,668,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,665,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$62,660,000TOTAL. . . .$78,325,000Sec. 7016. 2025 c 414 s 3065 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION OFFICE2025-27 Washington Coastal Restoration and Resiliency Initiative (40000568)The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is provided solely for projects identified in LEAP Capital Document No. RCO-8-2025, developed April 26, 2025.(2) The recreation and conservation funding board may retain a portion of the funds appropriated in this section for the administration of the grants. The portion of the funding retained for administration may not exceed 4.12 percent of the total grant award.(3) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,800,000))Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($3,836,000))Â Â Â Â Â $9,636,000((Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$9,636,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$38,544,000TOTAL. . . .$48,180,000Sec. 7017. 2025 c 414 s 3077 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Water Resource Conservation Irrigation Efficiencies (40000045)The appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation is provided solely for technical assistance and grants to conservation districts for the purpose of implementing water conservation measures and irrigation efficiencies. The state conservation commission shall give preference to projects prioritized locally or regionally through a planning process that includes public and partner input addressing water resource concerns.(2) Conservation districts statewide are eligible for grants listed in subsection (1) of this section. A conservation district receiving funds shall manage each grant to ensure that a portion of the water saved by the water conservation measure or irrigation efficiency will be available for other instream and out-of-stream uses and users. The proportion of saved water made available for other uses and users must be equal to the percentage of the public investment in the conservation measure or irrigation efficiency.(3) The appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .$7,000,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$7,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$28,000,000TOTAL. . . .$35,000,000Sec. 7018. 2025 c 414 s 3081 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION2025-2027 Voluntary Riparian Grant Program (40000049)The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1) The appropriation((s)) in this section ((are))is provided solely for the state conservation commission to provide grants for riparian restoration projects with landowners.(2)(a) Within funds appropriated in this section, the commission shall develop and implement the voluntary riparian grant program to fund protection and restoration of critical riparian management zones. The commission is responsible for developing the voluntary grant program criteria to achieve optimal restoration of functioning riparian ecosystems in priority critical riparian management zones.(b) In adopting program criteria, the commission shall:(i) Invite federally recognized tribes to be full participants;(ii) Coordinate with private landowners and other interested stakeholders;(iii) Coordinate with the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, conservation districts, and the department of agriculture; and(iv) Consider the best available, locally applicable science that is specific to each region of the state where the program criteria will be applied.(3) The commission shall prioritize critical riparian management zones at the watershed or subbasin scale where grant funding under the program would be primarily targeted. The prioritization must be informed by, consistent with, and aligned with one or more of the following: Watershed plans developed pursuant to chapter 90.82 RCW; the action agenda developed under RCW 90.71.260; regional recovery plans created under RCW 77.85.090; the habitat project lists developed pursuant to RCW 77.85.050; the prioritization process developed under RCW 77.95.160; and priority projects identified for salmon recovery through agency grant programs.(4) Conditions for awarding funding for projects under this program include, but are not limited to:(a) Consistency with the program criteria established under subsection (2) of this section;(b) Tiered incentive rates tied to improving functionality for riparian areas; and(c) Other requirements as determined by the commission.(5) The commission must distribute riparian grant program funding equitably throughout the state, consistent with received grant applications and benefit to salmon habitat. The legislature intends for funding to be primarily for projects located in salmon recovery regions, as defined in RCW 77.85.010, but funding may also be distributed to a project not located in a salmon recovery region upon a determination by the commission that the project will provide a unique benefit to salmon habitat.(6) Allowable expenses to a grantee receiving funds under this section include, but are not limited to, labor, equipment, fencing, mulch, seed, seedling trees, manual weed control, and yearly maintenance costs for up to 10 years.(7) Any native woody trees and shrubs planted with funding provided under this section must be maintained for a minimum of five years or as otherwise set by the commission for each grantee. Vegetation must be chosen to prevent invasive weed populations and ensure survival and successful establishment of plantings.(8) The commission shall determine appropriate recordkeeping and data collection procedures required for program implementation and shall establish a data management system that allows for coordination between the commission and other state agencies. Any data collected or shared under this section may be used only to assess the success of the riparian grant program in improving the functions of critical riparian habitat.(9) The commission shall develop and implement a framework that includes monitoring, adaptive management, and metrics in order to ensure consistency with the requirements of the riparian grant program. The monitoring and adaptive management framework may include, but is not limited to, consideration of:(a) Acres identified as eligible for restoration within a watershed;(b) Acres planned to be restored;(c) Acres actually planted and maintained;(d) Success in targeting and achieving aggregated project implementation resulting in an increase in linear miles restored;(e) Plan review criteria; and(f) Other similar factors as identified by the commission.(10) The commission may use up to two percent of any amounts appropriated in this section for targeted outreach activities that focus on critically identified geographic locations for listed salmon species.(11) The commission may use up to four percent of amounts appropriated in this section for administrative expenses.(12) For the purposes of this section, "critical riparian management zone" means the area adjacent to freshwaters, wetlands, and marine waters that has been locally or regionally identified as an area where salmon recovery efforts would significantly benefit from enhanced protection or restoration.(13) The ((state building construction accountâstate)) appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($20,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $25,000,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,000,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$25,000,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$100,000,000TOTAL. . . .$125,000,000Sec. 7019. 2025 c 414 s 3115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES2025-27 Rivers and Habitat Open Space Program (40000601)Appropriation:Natural Climate Solutions AccountâState. . . .(($2,305,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,631,000((State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$2,326,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$4,631,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,524,000TOTAL. . . .$23,155,000Sec. 7020. 2025 c 414 s 5020 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Major Infrastructure (30000808)Reappropriation:University of Washington Building AccountâState. . . .$6,577,000Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$10,300,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$10,300,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$50,223,000Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$42,300,000TOTAL. . . .$109,400,000Sec. 7021. 2025 c 414 s 5022 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONInfrastructure Renewal 25-27 (40000159)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$39,350,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$39,350,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$39,350,000Sec. 7022. 2025 c 414 s 5023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma - Campus Power Repairs (Phase 3) (40000160)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$3,900,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$3,900,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$3,900,000Sec. 7023. 2025 c 414 s 5024 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Bothell - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000161)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$4,530,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$4,530,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$18,120,000TOTAL. . . .$22,650,000Sec. 7024. 2025 c 414 s 5025 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Seattle - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000163)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$22,080,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$22,080,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$88,320,000TOTAL. . . .$110,400,000Sec. 7025. 2025 c 414 s 5026 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTONUW Tacoma - Asset Preservation (Minor Works) 25-27 (40000164)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,415,000((University of Washington BuildingAccountâState. . . .$5,415,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$21,660,000TOTAL. . . .$27,075,000Sec. 7026. 2025 c 414 s 5045 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYInstitutional Equipment Upgrades (40000166)Appropriation:((Central Washington University CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$1,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$0TOTAL. . . .$1,000,000Sec. 7027. 2025 c 414 s 5047 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000028)Appropriation:((Central Washington University CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$8,000,000))State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$8,000,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$32,000,000TOTAL. . . .$40,000,000Sec. 7028. 2025 c 414 s 5050 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE2025-27 Minor Works Preservation and Program (91000042)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($6,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $15,144,000((The Evergreen State College CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$9,144,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$15,144,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$60,576,000TOTAL. . . .$75,720,000Sec. 7029. 2025 c 414 s 5054 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITYAcademic Facilities Renewal - Phase I - V (40000017)Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .$5,524,000((Western Washington University CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$5,524,000))Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$22,096,000TOTAL. . . .$27,620,000Sec. 7030. 2025 c 414 s 5068 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGESMinor Works Preservation and Program (92001125)Appropriation:((Community and Technical College CapitalProjects AccountâState. . . .$71,168,000))Model Toxics Control Capital AccountâState. . . .$2,000,000State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($96,806,000))Â Â Â Â Â $167,974,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$169,974,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$679,896,000TOTAL. . . .$849,870,000Sec. 7031. 2025 c 414 s 5004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION2025-27 Classroom Indoor Air Quality Projects (40000144)The appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:(1)(a) (($5,568,000))$6,439,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and (($2,273,000))$1,402,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants to school districts with enrollments exceeding 3,000 students for indoor air quality assessment, installation, repair, or replacement of HVAC, air filtration enhancements, and general air quality improvements that improve student health and safety.(b) Grantees under this subsection (1) may: (i) Seek technical assistance from state-funded entities, such as the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of commerce, and the department of health; (ii) seek technical assistance from other entities, such as local health jurisdiction school safety programs and the smart buildings center's K-12 ventilation and indoor air quality resource team; and (iii) use funding awarded to seek guidance and technical assistance from commercial entities that have specialized knowledge of troubleshooting modern HVAC or smart building systems.(c) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and if applications for assessment grants under this subsection exceed available funding, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must first prioritize grants for school districts: (i) Without existing HVAC systems; (ii) that have documented proof of indoor air quality performance that does not meet current state energy code; (iii) with outdated or underperforming HVAC systems; and (iv) that have the most limited financial capacity. Assessments funded under this subsection (1)(c) must include professional cost estimates for mitigating the indoor air quality deficiencies identified.(2)(a) $6,932,000 of the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation and $2,727,000 of the state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section are provided solely for grants to school districts with enrollments that are less than or equal to 3,000 students for assessment, installation, repair, or replacement of HVAC, air filtration enhancements, and general air quality improvements that improve student health and safety.(b) Grantees under this subsection may: (i) Seek technical assistance from state funded entities, such as the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of commerce, and the department of health; (ii) seek technical assistance from other entities, such as local health jurisdiction school safety programs and the smart buildings center's K-12 ventilation and indoor air quality resource team; and (iii) use funding awarded to seek guidance and technical assistance from commercial entities that have specialized knowledge of troubleshooting modern HVAC or smart building systems.(c) Subject to subsection (3) of this section and if applications grants under this subsection exceed available funding, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must first prioritize grants for school districts: (i) Without existing HVAC systems; (ii) that have documented proof of indoor air quality performance that does not meet current state energy code; (iii) with outdated or underperforming HVAC systems; and (iv) that have the most limited financial capacity.(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must first allocate, to the maximum extent feasible, the funding appropriated under this section to grants prioritized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. However, as necessary to award grants using the climate commitment accountâstate appropriation in this section, the superintendent of public instruction may also prioritize grants under this section that will improve compliance with the state's energy-related building standards in chapter 19.27A RCW by reducing energy use intensity.(4) The state building construction accountâstate appropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of section 8018 of this act.Appropriation:State Building Construction AccountâState. . . .(($5,000,000))Â Â Â Â Â $4,129,000Climate Commitment AccountâState. . . .(($12,500,000))Â Â Â Â Â $13,371,000Subtotal Appropriation. . . .$17,500,000Prior Biennia (Expenditures). . . .$0Future Biennia (Projected Costs). . . .$70,000,000TOTAL. . . .$87,500,000(End of part)PART 8MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec. 8001. 2025 c 414 s 8001 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:RCW 43.88.031 requires the disclosure of the estimated debt service costs associated with new capital bond appropriations. The estimated debt service costs for the appropriations contained in this act are (($73,258,483))$21,032,107 for the 2025-2027 biennium, (($410,061,655))$402,516,180 for the 2027-2029 biennium, and (($631,176,449))$712,192,926 for the 2029-2031 biennium.Sec. 8002. 2025 c 414 s 8002 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: (1) The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance committee.(2) Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible for state funded maintenance and operations.(3) Western Washington University: Enter into a financing contract for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a parking lot replacement. (4) Community and technical colleges: (a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin College for up to $18,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct student housing. (b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds College for up to $9,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire student housing. (c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Clover Park Technical College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire and renovate an eastside training facility.(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Renton Technical College for up to $8,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to continue renovations in Building J.(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community College for up to $5,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct an athletic field and related support amenities.(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia College for up to $3,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to make necessary targeted improvements to field lighting, grandstands, and support facilities at the David Story field.(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community College for up to $15,000,000 plus financing expenses, required reserves, and capitalized interest pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the east wing of the main building.Sec. 8003. 2025 c 414 s 8003 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: (1) To ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive intent, agencies must complete a predesign for state construction projects with a total anticipated cost in excess of (($10,000,000))$15,000,000. For purposes of this section, "total anticipated cost" means the sum of the anticipated cost of the predesign, design, and construction phases of the project.(2) Appropriations for design may not be expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign.(3) The predesign must explore at least three project alternatives. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. The chosen alternative should be the most reasonable and cost-effective solution. The predesign document must include, but not be limited to, program, site, and cost analysis, and an analysis of the life-cycle costs of the alternatives explored, in accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management.(4) For projects exceeding the (($10,000,000))$15,000,000 predesign threshold established in this section, the office of financial management may make an exception to some or all of the predesign requirements in this section. The office of financial management shall report any exception to the fiscal committees of the legislature:(a) A description of the major capital project for which the predesign waiver is made;(b) An explanation of the reason for the waiver; and(c) A rough order of magnitude cost estimate for the project's design and construction.(5) In deliberations related to submitting an exception under this section, the office of financial management shall consider the following factors:(a) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding the site of the project;(b) Whether there is any determination to be made regarding whether the project will involve renovation, new construction, or both;(c) Whether, within six years of submitting the request for funding, the agency has completed, or initiated the construction of, a substantially similar project;(d) Whether there is any anticipated change to the project's program or the services to be delivered at the facility;(e) Whether the requesting agency indicates that the project may not require some or all of the predesign requirements in this section due to a lack of complexity; and(f) Whether any other factors related to project complexity or risk, as determined by the office of financial management, could reduce the need for, or scope of, a predesign.(6) If under this section, some or all predesign requirements are waived, the office of financial management may instead propose a professional project cost estimate instead of a request for predesign funding.Sec. 8004. 2025 c 414 s 8004 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: (1) The legislature finds that use of life-cycle cost analysis will aid public entities, architects, engineers, and contractors in making design and construction decisions that positively impact both the initial construction cost and the ongoing operating and maintenance cost of a project. To ensure that the total cost of a project is accounted for and the most reasonable and cost efficient design is used, agencies shall develop life-cycle costs for any construction project over $10,000,000. The life-cycle costs must represent the present value sum of capital costs, installation costs, operating costs, and maintenance costs over the life expectancy of the project. The legislature further finds the most effective approach to the life-cycle cost analysis is to integrate it into the early part of the design process.(2) Agencies must develop a minimum of three project alternatives for use in the life-cycle cost analysis. These alternatives must be both distinctly different and viable solutions to the issue being addressed. Agencies must choose the most reasonable and cost-effective solution, as supported by the life-cycle cost analysis. A brief description of each project alternative and why it was chosen must be included in the life-cycle cost analysis section of the predesign.(3) ((The office of financial management))The department of commerce shall: (a) Make available a life-cycle cost model to be used for analysis; (b) in consultation with the department of enterprise services, provide assistance in using the life-cycle cost model; and (c) update the life-cycle cost model annually including assumptions for inflation rates, discount rates, and energy rates.(4) Agencies shall consider architectural and engineering firms' and general contractors' experience using life-cycle costs, operating costs, and energy efficiency measures when selecting an architectural and engineering firm, or when selecting contractors using alternative contracting methods.Sec. 8005. 2025 c 414 s 8016 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: (1) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, unless otherwise specified for a single purpose in this act or chapter 414, Laws of 2025, agencies are appropriated one lump sum for minor works projects. It is the intent of the legislature that appropriated funds be spent in the biennium for which they are appropriated.(2) Minor works projects may not exceed $4,000,000 for institutions of higher education and $2,000,000 for all other agencies. Administrative fees may not exceed four percent for each project.(3) Except as provided by the legislature, agencies are encouraged to prioritize minor works projects based on:(a) Health and safety of employees or clients served;(b) The amount of use of a given facility or system;(c) The avoidance of future increased costs of repair or maintenance; and(d) The avoidance of increased operating costs.(4) Minor works appropriations may not be used for:(a) Projects that are a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time, would exceed the amounts provided in subsection (2) of this section;(b) Studies, planning, or design, except for technical or engineering reviews or designs that lead directly to and support a minor works project;(c) Movable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office of financial management, including rolling stock and computers;(d) Software not dedicated to control of a specialized system;(e) Moving expenses;(f) Land or facility acquisition; or(g) Funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless expressly authorized by the office of financial management for exigent circumstances with notice to the legislative fiscal committees.(5) If a minor works appropriation does not specify it is to be used for preservation or program improvements, up to 25 percent of the appropriation may be used for program improvements. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the Americans with disabilities act qualify as preservation improvements.(6) Agencies must use reappropriations before newly appropriated amounts without regard to lists or projects that were submitted at the time the funds were appropriated.(7) No later than ((December 15th))October 1st of each even numbered year, agencies must submit to the governor, house capital budget committee, and senate ways and means committee, a list of minor works projects completed or in progress for the current biennium including: Project status, project cost, amount expended, and amount encumbered for projects not yet complete.(8) Requests for minor works appropriations for ((the next biennium))the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium and future biennia must take into account minor works amounts to be reappropriated and the amount of minor works projects that can reasonably be completed in the next biennium.Sec. 8006. 2025 c 414 s 8018 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature intends that appropriations for grant programs and community projects be spent in a timely manner in order to accomplish the goal for which they were appropriated. In furtherance of this goal, the legislature does not intend to reappropriate moneys for projects for which a contract has not been executed within four years from the date of appropriation or for which appropriations have not been spent within six years of appropriation:(a) For grant programs and community projects appropriated from the state building construction account; or(b) For other programs for which this act specifies the appropriation is subject to the provisions of this section.(2) Nothing in this section operates as a guarantee of reappropriation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8007. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:The legislature finds that local and community projects, as well as other direct appropriations, are a vital means of responding directly to pressing and emergent community needs across the state. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to provide the department of commerce with direction regarding the implementation of these projects, including changes to their scope and location, so as to facilitate their timely completion and in a manner that is consistent with legislative intent. Capital grants that are appropriated on a line item basis and administered by the department of commerce must meet the conditions in this section.(1) Grants may be used to pay for the following construction-related expenses:(a) Design, architectural, and engineering work;(b) Building permits and fees;(c) Archaeological and historical review;(d) Construction labor and materials;(e) Demolition and site preparation;(f) Capitalized equipment;(g) Information technology infrastructure (cables and wiring);(h) Construction management from external sources only;(i) Initial furnishings;(j) Landscaping; and(k) Real property when purchased specifically for the project, and associated costs.(2) Grants may not be used for the following purposes:(a) Internal administrative activities;(b) Mortgage or loan payments;(c) Labor or project/construction management from internal sources;(d) Fundraising activities;(e) Feasibility studies;(f) Computers or office equipment;(g) Rolling stock (such as vehicles);(h) Lease payments for rental of equipment or facilities;(i) Any maintenance or operating costs;(j) Property leases (including long-term);(k) The moving of equipment, furniture, etc., between facilities; and(l) Any in-kind labor.(3) The department may not expend appropriations unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been either expended or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the legislature. This requirement does not apply to projects where a share of the appropriation is for design costs only.(4) Before receiving funds, the grantee must demonstrate the project site is or will be under control for a minimum of 10 years, either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities.(5) Projects may be required to comply with Washington's high performance building standards under chapter 39.35D RCW.(6) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only and may not be advanced under any circumstances.(7) The department shall include provisions that require capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.(8) Projects, including those that are owned and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay state prevailing wages.(9) The department must comply with the requirements set forth in executive order 21-02 and must consult with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes on the potential effects of these projects on cultural resources and historic properties. Consultation with the department of archaeology and historic preservation and affected tribes must be initiated before project funds are made available.(10) The department may authorize scope changes if:(a) The change request maintains the same scope, purpose, and recipient of the project, but changes the project's location within the same legislative district;(b) The change request is due to the project receiving funding at a lower level than requested and the grantee is requesting to use the appropriated amount for one or more, but fewer than all, of the project's components as outlined in the member request form;(c) The change request is to move funding between the project's listed components, but the requested change will still meet the overall project goals, as determined by the department of commerce;(d) The change request is due to the project experiencing higher than estimated bids and the grantee is requesting to use the funding for one or more, but fewer than all, of the project's listed components; or(e) The change request would result in a different entity administering the appropriated funding, if the new entity has the capacity to administer the funding and there is a documented agreement between the grantee and the new entity.(11) The following scope changes may not be authorized and must be submitted for legislative approval in a subsequent capital appropriations bill:(a) A change that would move the project location outside the intended legislative district.(b) A change that does not meet the criteria set forth in subsection (1) of this section.(c) A change that would replace the originally funded project with an unrelated project that does not advance the original purpose.(12) If it becomes apparent that the department is unable to enter into a contract for a project as originally intended due to a change request that falls under subsection (11) of this section, the department must submit a list of those projects to the legislature and the office of financial management by November 1st of each fiscal year following the determination, including the following information:(a) The project title and grantee;(b) The act and section under which the project was appropriated;(c) The legislative district of the project;(d) A summary of the original project; and(e) A summary of the change request.(13) In the event of a conflict between the general provisions set forth in this section and the provisions set forth for a specific program administered by the department, whether such provisions are established in statute or in a budget appropriation, the provisions for the specific program shall control. Any project funded on a line item basis within a program administered by the department must comply with the department's guidelines for that program unless such guidelines conflict with requirements established in statute, in a budget appropriation, or in this section.Sec. 8008. 2025 c 414 s 8019 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: FOR THE STATE TREASURERâTRANSFERS(1) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the water pollution control revolving accountâstate, up to $20,500,000 for fiscal year 2026 ((and up to $20,500,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$41,000,000)). . . .$20,500,000(2) Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the drinking water assistance accountâstate, up to (($12,500,000))$15,522,000 for fiscal year 2026 and up to (($12,500,000))$16,398,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .(($25,000,000))$31,920,000(3) Model Toxics Control Stormwater AccountâState: For transfer to the model toxics control capital accountâstate, up to $15,000,000 for fiscal year 2026 and up to (($15,000,0000))$15,000,000 for fiscal year 2027. . . .$30,000,000Sec. 8009. 2025 c 414 s 8023 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows: Any agency receiving appropriations in this act from climate commitment act accounts created in RCW 70A.65.240 through 70A.65.280 must report to and coordinate with the department of ecology to track expenditures as described in RCW 70A.65.300 and chapter 173-446B WAC. If an expenditure is expected to result in greenhouse gas emission reductions, the agency must use a department of ecology approved calculator tool or methodology.Sec. 8010. RCW 43.79.565 and 2022 c 297 s 946 are each amended to read as follows:The capital community assistance account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other moneys directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be used for capital costs to provide community support services, and for infrastructure and other capital expenditures to support the well-being of communities. For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may be used for the capital projects advisory review board to complete a prevailing wage study.Sec. 8011. RCW 43.330.483 and 2023 c 380 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the low-income home rehabilitation grant program is created within the department.(2) The program must include the following elements:(a) Eligible homeowners must be low-income and live in rural areas.(b) Homeowners who are senior citizens, persons with disabilities, families with children five years old and younger, and veterans must receive priority for grants.(c) The cost of the home rehabilitation must be the lesser of:(i) 80 percent of the assessed or appraised value of the property post rehabilitation, whichever is greater; or(ii) $50,000.(d) The maximum amount that may be granted under this program may not exceed the cost of the home rehabilitation as provided in (c) of this subsection.(3) The department must adopt rules for implementation of this grant program.(4) Notwithstanding RCW 43.330.480(2) and subsection (2)(a) of this section, for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, amounts appropriated for low-income home rehabilitation projects impacted by the weather event described in emergency proclamation 25-07.2 are not limited to homeowners in rural areas.Sec. 8012. RCW 77.12.037 and 2025 c 414 s 8037 are each amended to read as follows:The commission may acquire by gift, easement, purchase, lease, or condemnation lands, buildings, water rights, rights-of-way, or other necessary property, and construct and maintain necessary facilities for purposes consistent with this title. The commission may authorize the director to acquire property under this section, but the power of condemnation may only be exercised by the director when an appropriation has been made by the legislature for the acquisition of a specific property, except to clear title and acquire access rights-of-way.The commission may sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the control of the department.During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, this section does not apply to the sale of land pursuant to section 3102, chapter 414, Laws of 2025 or section 3017 or 3019, chapter . . ., Laws of 2026 (section 3017 or 3019 of this act).Sec. 8013. RCW 77.12.210 and 2025 c 414 s 8038 are each amended to read as follows:The director shall maintain and manage real or personal property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and maintenance of the property.The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease, convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber, gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or personal property or grant concessions or rights-of-way for roads or utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state which lie below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be offered for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to chapter 79.14 RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3): PROVIDED, That the commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases at the request of the department to protect wildlife and its habitat.If the commission determines that real or personal property held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department, the director may dispose of that property if it is in the public interest.If the state acquired real property with use limited to specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the property is located at least 20 days prior to sale.Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the fish, wildlife, and conservation account created in RCW 77.12.170(3).During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, this section does not apply to the sale of land pursuant to section 3102, chapter 414, Laws of 2025 or section 3017 or 3019, chapter . . ., Laws of 2026 (section 3017 or 3019 of this act).Sec. 8014. RCW 77.12.220 and 2025 c 414 s 8039 are each amended to read as follows:For purposes of this title, the commission may make agreements to obtain real or personal property or to transfer or convey property held by the state to the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities, units of local government of this state, public service companies, or other persons, if in the judgment of the commission and the attorney general the transfer and conveyance is consistent with public interest. For purposes of this section, "local government" means any city, town, county, special district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation.If the commission agrees to a transfer or conveyance under this section or to a sale or return of real property under RCW 77.12.210, the director shall certify, with the attorney general, to the governor that the agreement has been made. The certification shall describe the real property. The governor then may execute and the secretary of state attest and deliver to the appropriate entity or person the instrument necessary to fulfill the agreement.During the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, this section does not apply to the sale of land pursuant to section 3102, chapter 414, Laws of 2025 or section 3017 or 3019, chapter . . ., Laws of 2026 (section 3017 or 3019 of this act).Sec. 8015. RCW 43.99N.060 and 2025 c 414 s 8048 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The stadium and exhibition center account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the taxes imposed under RCW 82.14.0494 and distributions under RCW 67.70.240(1)(d) shall be deposited into the account. Only the director of the office of financial management or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW. An appropriation is not required for expenditures from this account.(2) Until bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, up to $5,000,000 per year beginning January 1, 1999, shall be used for the purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, all remaining moneys in the account shall be transferred to the public stadium authority, created under RCW 36.102.020, to be used for public stadium authority operations and development of the stadium and exhibition center.(3) After bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account shall be used exclusively for the following purposes in the following priority:(a) On or before June 30th of each year, the office of financial management shall accumulate in the stadium and exhibition center account an amount at least equal to the amount required in the next succeeding twelve months for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020;(b) An additional reserve amount not in excess of the expected average annual principal and interest requirements of bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be accumulated and maintained in the account, subject to withdrawal by the state treasurer at any time if necessary to meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection, and, following any withdrawal, reaccumulated from the first tax revenues and other amounts deposited in the account after meeting the requirements of (a) of this subsection; and(c) The balance, if any, shall be transferred to the youth athletic facility account under subsection (4) of this section.Any revenues derived from the taxes authorized by RCW 36.38.010(5) and 36.38.040 or other amounts that if used as provided under (a) and (b) of this subsection would cause the loss of any tax exemption under federal law for interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 shall be deposited in and used exclusively for the purposes of the youth athletic facility account and shall not be used, directly or indirectly, as a source of payment of principal of or interest on bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020, or to replace or reimburse other funds used for that purpose.(4) Any moneys in the stadium and exhibition center account not required or permitted to be used for the purposes described in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section shall be deposited in the youth athletic facility account hereby created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes of grants or loans to cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations for community outdoor athletic facilities. Only the director of the recreation and conservation office or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The athletic facility grants or loans may be used for acquiring, developing, equipping, maintaining, and improving community outdoor athletic facilities. Funds shall be divided equally between the development of new community outdoor athletic facilities, the improvement of existing community outdoor athletic facilities, and the maintenance of existing community outdoor athletic facilities. Cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must submit proposals for grants or loans from the account. To the extent that funds are available, cities, counties, and qualified nonprofit organizations must meet eligibility criteria as established by the director of the recreation and conservation office. The grants and loans shall be awarded on a competitive application process and the amount of the grant or loan shall be in proportion to the population of the city or county for where the community outdoor athletic facility is located. Grants or loans awarded in any one year need not be distributed in that year. The director of the recreation and conservation office may expend up to one and one-half percent of the moneys deposited in the account created in this subsection for administrative purposes. During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the youth athletic facility account to support a task force to consider ways to improve equitable access to K-12 schools' fields and athletic facilities and local parks agency facilities with the goal of increasing physical activity for youth and families. A portion of the appropriation must be used to inventory K-12 school fields and athletic facilities and park agency facilities.(5) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, subsection (4) of this section applies to expenditures from the youth athletic facility account except as provided in this subsection.(a) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal biennia, the recreation and conservation office may spend appropriations made from the youth athletic facility account for grants and loans to political subdivisions of the state other than cities and counties as well as federally recognized Indian tribes for community outdoor athletic facilities. The office is not required to divide the expenditures equally between development, improvement, and maintenance of facilities. The office's authority to retain 1.5 percent of amounts deposited in the account for administration is suspended, and the office's administrative overhead is instead specified in the appropriations for this purpose.(b) During the 2023-2025 and 2025-2027 fiscal ((biennium))biennia, the legislature may also appropriate moneys in the youth athletic facility account for the following:(i) To the department of commerce for the public facility improvement fund as provided in section 1038, chapter 474, Laws of 2023; and(ii) To the recreation and conservation office for the purpose of the youth athletic facilities program as provided in section 3060, chapter 474, Laws of 2023.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8016. A new section is added to 2025 c 414 (uncodified) to read as follows:(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop requests for omnibus capital appropriations for the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium for implementation of the school construction assistance program (SCAP) revision planning study proposals specified in this section.(2) The legislature finds that the school construction assistance program must continue to develop in support of school districts' diverse and complex facility needs. Further, the legislature deeply values school districts' engagement in the SCAP revision planning study process and finds that this study represents a critical step in the continuing efforts to improve the program. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to prepare for the school construction assistance program's revision through the initial implementation steps outlined in this section.(3) Except as provided for in subsection (4) of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must perform the planning and analysis, including fiscal estimates, that would be necessary for the office, pending funding and rule making, to implement the following proposals of the SCAP revision planning study, as published on the "Reports to the legislature" website, dated November 18, 2025:(a) Proposal 1: Improved planning framework with education and outreach support;(b) Proposal 4: Develop an education specification prototype;(c) Proposal 7: Allow phased modernizations;(d) Proposal 8: Streamline and enhance D-Form process; and(e) The grade band configuration and enrollment projection elements of proposal 9 (update SCAP calculation methodologies).(4) In the planning and analysis performed under subsection (3) of this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must be faithful to the spirit and framework of the specified SCAP revision planning study's proposals, but may adapt or modify the proposals for the purpose of improving their integration into the school construction assistance program's administrative rules and for the purpose of compliance with the program's governing statutes. Further, to the extent that the office adapts or modifies any of the SCAP revision proposals pursuant to this section, it must describe these changes in the biennial appropriations request submitted under subsection (5) of this section.(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall request any funding required for implementation of the SCAP revision proposals listed in this section, including for any related rule making, as part of the office's request for omnibus capital appropriations in the 2027-2029 fiscal biennium.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8017. 2025 c 414 s 8020 (uncodified) is repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8018. If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8019. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8020. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.(End of part)--- END ---